S.  967,  PREPACKAGED  NEWS  STORIES 

S.  HRG.  109–1091 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

MAY  12,  2005 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

61–937 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2010 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on May 12, 2005 
...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Dorgan  .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye  ..................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Kerry  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg  ..........................................................................
................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 

WITNESSES 

Adelstein,  Hon.  Jonathan  S.,  Commissioner,  Federal  Communications  Com-
mission  ..................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Cochran, Barbara, President, Radio-Television News Directors Association  .....
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Phair, Judith T., President/CEO, Public Relations Society of America (PRSA)  .
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Poling,  Susan  A.,  Managing  Associate  General  Counsel,  Office  of  General 
......................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Schlick,  Austin  C.,  Acting  General  Counsel,  Federal  Communications  Com-
mission  ..................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Simon, Douglas, President/CEO, D S Simon Productions, Inc.  ...........................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Counsel, Government Accountability Office 

Page 
1 
15 
1 
1 
16 
2 
1 

4 
5 
28 
29 
36 
38 

22 
24 

7 
8 
32 
34 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

S.  967,  PREPACKAGED  NEWS  STORIES 

THURSDAY,  MAY  12,  2005 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10:04  a.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Ted  Stevens, 
Chairman of the Committee, presiding. 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

The CHAIRMAN. This is the hearing that I said we would hold on 
a  bill  sponsored  by  Senator  Lautenberg  to  create  a  new  section  in 
the Communications Act of 1934 to require broadcasters, cable, and 
satellite  providers  and  other  persons  to  ensure  that  the  origin  of 
prepackaged news stories produced by our Government is disclosed 
to  the  public.  The  bill  would  cover  prepackaged  news  stories  in-
tended  to  be  aired  within  the  United  States.  It  would  make  it  ille-
gal  for  any  person  to  remove  the  Federal  agency  disclosure  re-
quired  by  a  provision  in  the  defense  supplemental  bill  that  passed 
the  Senate  earlier  this  week.  That  was  the  Byrd  Amendment.  It 
was adopted on the supplemental. 

This  hearing  will  focus  on  the  need  to  amend  the  Communica-
tions  Act  to  authorize  the  Federal  Communications  Commission  to 
regulate  the  news  industry’s  handling  of  what  we  now  know  as 
VNR’s. 

The  first  panel  this  morning 

is  the  Honorable  Jonathan 
Adelstein,  Commissioner  of  the  Federal  Communications  Commis-
sion,  and  Mr.  Austin  Schlick,  the  Acting  General  Counsel  of  the 
Federal Communications Commission. 

Senator Inouye, do you have an opening statement? 

STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

Senator INOUYE. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. I do have 
an opening statement. I thank you for calling today’s hearing. May 
I have my full statement made part of the record? 

The CHAIRMAN. Without objection. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Inouye follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
Mr. Chairman, I want to thank you for calling today’s hearing to examine current 
practices  concerning  the  use  of  Video  News  Releases,  commonly  referred  to  as 
‘‘VNRs.’’ 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

When  used  appropriately,  VNRs,  like  written  press  releases,  can  provide  tele-
vision news directors with an important source of information and video footage that 
can then be reviewed and edited to create independent news stories. 

Unfortunately,  as  recent  press  accounts  have  documented,  the  increasingly  ‘‘pre-
packaged’’ and scripted nature of VNRs, sometimes including actors posing as news 
reporters,  has  tempted  some  news  organizations  to  air  VNRs  in  full  without  dis-
closing the true source of such information. 

Based on these reports, I wrote to then-Chairman of the Federal Communications 
Commission (FCC), Michael Powell, in March of this year, asking the FCC to inves-
tigate  this  matter  and  to  take  whatever  remedial  action  was  necessary  to  prevent 
television and radio audiences from being misled. 

Roughly  one  month  later,  the  FCC,  under  the  leadership  of  its  newly  appointed 
Chairman,  Kevin  Martin,  responded  by  unanimously  adopting  a  public  notice  that 
reminds  broadcasters  and  cable  operators  of  the  disclosure  obligations  under  the 
Communications  Act  and  requests  further  investigation  into  the  production,  provi-
sion, and use of VNRs. 

Today’s  hearing  lets  us  examine  in  greater  detail  the  problems  that  arise  when 
VNRs  created  by  government  agencies  are  distributed  without  proper  disclosure  to 
the  viewing  public  about  their  true  source.  This  practice  has  been  criticized  by  the 
Government  Accountability  Office  (GAO)  for  some  time.  The  GAO  has  taken  issue 
with the current Administration’s interpretation of when attribution is required. 

This  is  not  a  partisan  issue.  Congress  passed  language  as  part  of  the  Supple-
mental  Appropriations  bill  this  past  Tuesday  that  will  prevent  Federal  agencies 
from using funds appropriated this fiscal year to create such prepackaged news sto-
ries  unless  clear  government  attribution  is  provided.  While  this  restriction  is  only 
temporary, other proposals have been advanced that would result in a more perma-
nent solution. 

Mr.  Chairman,  it  was  Thomas  Jefferson  who  first  noted  that  ‘‘information  is  the 
currency of democracy.’’ But its true value to our society can only be realized if our 
ethical  standards  require,  and  our  laws  enforce,  a  level  of  transparency  and  open-
ness that protect the American public from being misled. As a result, I look forward 
to today’s hearing and to our continuing efforts to enrich civic discourse. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Senator  Lautenberg,  do  you  have  an  opening 

statement? 

STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I  do.  First,  I  want  to  thank  you,  Mr. 
Chairman,  for  holding  this  hearing.  I  know  that  it  was  taken  off 
a  busy  agenda,  but  you  did  make  a  promise,  and  those  who  know 
you  know  that  you  always  keep  the  promise.  We  have  to  be  able 
to  trust  one  another  to  get  things  done  here.  As  we  see  in  these 
days, it is not always easy. 

Well,  I  am  hopeful  that  soon  after  this  hearing  we  can  move 
ahead on a markup of this legislation so we can move it to the full 
Senate. 

The purpose of the bill that I have introduced with Senator John 
Kerry is simple and straightforward. It would stop the Government 
from  producing  covert  propaganda.  And  by  the  way,  I  want  to  say 
that  this  is,  to  my  knowledge,  not  the  first  time  that  it  has  been 
done. So this is not simply a finger pointing at the present Admin-
istration. 

Over the past year, the American people have learned of numer-
ous incidents in which the Administration produced fake news sto-
ries  that  concealed  the  Government’s  role.  And  we  have  also 
learned  of  journalists  who  were  paid  off  to  write  favorable  articles 
about  Administration  policies.  The  best  known  example  of  jour-
nalism  for  hire  was  the  columnist  and  radio  commentator,  Arm-
strong  Williams,  who  was  paid  to  write  and  say  favorable  things 
about the No Child Left Behind law. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

And cases of journalism for hire continue to be exposed. Just this 
week,  we  learned  that  the  Department  of  Agriculture  had  paid  a 
writer to produce favorable articles, which were then placed in pub-
lications.  The  people  who  read  the  article  had  no  way  of  knowing 
that these news stories, so-called, were bought and paid for by the 
Government. 

When  President  Bush  learned  about  the  Armstrong  Williams 
case, he said it was wrong and he correctly said that the Adminis-
tration policies should be able to stand on their own merits without 
need to bribe journalists. And we commend him for that. 

When  it  comes  to  another  form,  however,  of  Government  propa-
ganda,  the  Administration  has  been  unwilling  to  shut  it  down. 
That  other  form  of  propaganda  is  the  production  and  distribution 
of fake video news reports that conceal the Government’s role. One 
notorious  example  of  such  prepackaged  news  stories  are  the  news 
stories  paid  for  by  the  Department  of  Health  and  Human  Services 
that  promoted  the  new  Medicare  drug  law.  Not  only  did  this  sup-
posed news report contain misleading and slanted information, but 
it  was  signed  off  as  ‘‘this  is  Karen  Ryan  reporting  from  Wash-
ington,’’ but Karen Ryan was not the reporter. She is a public rela-
tions  consultant  that  was  contracted  to  voice  over  that  fake  news 
report.  And  the  fake  news  segment  gave  no  indication  that  it  was 
actually a Government production. 

The  Government  Accountability  Office  has  determined  that  this 
practice  constitutes—and  here  I  quote—‘‘covert  propaganda.’’  And 
it  is  illegal.  The  GAO  told  the  Bush  Administration  that  it  must 
identify  itself  in  these  news  pieces.  But  incredibly,  the  Office  of 
Management and Budget sent a memo to all Government agencies 
saying  that  it  is  all  right  to  hide  their  sponsorship  of  these  fake 
news stories. 

And  that  is  why  John  Kerry  and  I  think  this  bill  is  necessary. 
Our  bill  tells  the  Administration  that  if  they  want  to  produce  fake 
news stories, they have to tell the American people who made and 
paid  for  these  stories.  President  Bush  has  said  it  is  the  burden  of 
the  broadcasters  who  use  prepackaged  news  stories  to  figure  out 
where  the  VNR  came  from.  I  disagree.  Why  put  the  burden  on  in-
dustry  when  the  Government  can  solve  the  problem  in  a  simple 
and  efficient  way?  The  only  way  to  ensure  that  the  American  peo-
ple  know  what  they  are  watching  is  to  include  that  information  in 
the video itself. 

Once again, I thank Chairman Stevens and Co-Chairman Inouye 
for  staying  true  to  their  word,  holding  this  hearing.  Again,  I  hope 
that a markup will soon follow. Our staffs have had productive con-
versations  on  this  issue,  and  I  am  hopeful  that  this  hearing  will 
lead us to a bipartisan bill so we can soon move to the full Senate 
for consideration. Thanks again, Mr. Chairman. 

I look forward to the testimony of our witnesses today. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Our  first  witness  this  morning  is  Commissioner  Adelstein  from 

the FCC. 

All  witnesses’  statements  will  appear  in  the  record  as  though 
read.  We  appreciate  your  comments  and  brevity,  if  possible.  There 
will be a vote this morning, I guess two votes starting at 11:40. 

Commissioner Adelstein. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

STATEMENT OF HON. JONATHAN S. ADELSTEIN, 

4 

COMMISSIONER, FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS COMMISSION 
Mr.  ADELSTEIN.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  Mr.  Co-Chairman, 
Senator  Lautenberg.  I  appreciate  your  invitation  to  testify  this 
morning  on  a  matter  of  great  concern  to  me  and  to  the  FCC.  I 
think  this  hearing  is  especially  timely  because  it  can  help  us  com-
bat  the  surprising  lack  of  awareness  that  the  law  and  the  FCC 
rules  require  disclosure  of  who  is  behind  certain  paid,  political  or 
controversial programming. 

Congress  has  maintained  the  principle  from  the  outset  of  broad-
casting that consumers have a right to know who is trying to influ-
ence  them.  Sponsorship  identification  laws  date  back  to  the  Radio 
Act of 1927, making these laws older than the FCC itself. Congress 
has  maintained  an  unwavering  requirement  that  broadcasters 
must  announce  who  gave  them  valuable  consideration  to  air  any-
thing.  In  the  case  of  controversial  issue  programming  or  political 
programming,  the  FCC’s  interpretation  of  the  law  has  always  re-
quired  that  whenever  a  third  party  provides  material  to  induce  its 
broadcast, the identity of the source must also be disclosed to view-
ers.  So  the  seriousness  with  which  you  are  treating  this  matter  is 
entirely  consistent  with  the  historical  concern  of  this  committee 
and of Congress as a whole. 

Because  of  the  need  to  highlight  our  rules,  I  was  especially 
pleased that last month the FCC voted unanimously to remind the 
industry  of  their  legal  obligations.  With  the  leadership  of  our  new 
Chairman,  Kevin  Martin,  we  came  together  on  a  bipartisan  basis 
to  alert  the  industry  that  we  take  our  responsibilities  in  this  mat-
ter  extremely  seriously  and  plan  to  enforce  the  law  vigorously.  We 
also sought comments to learn more about how VNRs are used and 
whether we need to refine our rules even further. 

A  lot  of  analysts  believe  that  the  urgency  of  this  issue  arises  in 
large  measure  because  of  the  increasing  commercialization  of  the 
media.  Pressures  on  the  bottom  line  are  forcing  reductions  in  re-
sources for news operations. And this creates a void that PR firms 
are happy to fill with VNRs. They are cheaper to produce than ads, 
free to get on the air, and more effective because they are designed 
to  mimic  news  stories.  But  this  can  seriously  mislead  viewers  and 
has probably contributed to the well documented loss of public con-
fidence in today’s media. 

Another  symptom  of  commercialization  is  seen  in  the  reports  of 
a rising tide of undisclosed product placements in our media. I am 
concerned  that  there  seems  to  be  a  lack  of  awareness  here,  too,  of 
the  need  for  disclosure  under  our  rules.  Everyone  in  the  industry 
would  be  well  served  if  they  were  to  review  our  public  notice  on 
video  news  releases  because  those  very  same  rules  can  apply  to 
product placements. 

The  focus  of  today’s  hearing  is  on  the  use  of  VNRs  by  govern-
ment agencies. As recently as 2002, the FCC reiterated that disclo-
sure  is  particularly  important  when  the  government  sponsors  the 
broadcast matter. You have heard about conflicting interpretations 
between the Justice Department and GAO about whether unidenti-
fied government VNRs violate laws against covert propaganda. The 
Commission  has  no  jurisdiction  over  these  laws  and  has  taken  no 
position.  But  neither  Justice  nor  GAO  has  noted  that  the  failure 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

by broadcasters and cable companies to identify the source of VNRs 
could  violate  the  FCC’s  sponsorship  ID  rules.  As  we  said  in  our 
public notice, these companies do have an obligation to disclose the 
source of political or controversial VNRs. 

If  Congress  seeks  to  ensure  that  the  public  is  notified  about  the 
source of government-sponsored VNRs, legislation such as S. 967 is 
necessary to bolster our existing rules. This legislation would apply 
whether  or  not  consideration  was  exchanged  and  whether  or  not 
controversial  or  political  issues  were  involved.  It  would  also  pro-
hibit  the  removal  of  the  announcement.  The  bill  does  not  specify 
the  precise  nature  of  the  announcement,  but  instead  leaves  it  to 
the FCC to work with broadcasters to determine how to achieve the 
right  balance  between  the  public’s  right  to  know  and  editorial  dis-
cretion. The bill would not impose any new burden on broadcasters 
or  cable  companies.  In  fact,  it  would  simplify  compliance.  It  would 
ensure  that  those  airing  VNRs  are  aware  of  the  government’s  role 
in producing them. Most importantly, it addresses the public’s right 
to know the source of the broadcast so they can make up their own 
minds about the information being presented. 

Again,  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  testify,  and 

I would be happy to answer any questions you might have. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Adelstein follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JONATHAN S. ADELSTEIN, COMMISSIONER, 

FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS COMMISSION 

Mr.  Chairman,  Mr.  Co-Chairman,  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  thank  you  for 
inviting me to testify before you today about pre-packaged news stories, also known 
as video news releases, or ‘‘VNRs.’’ The issue of concern with pre-packaged news sto-
ries  is  that,  absent  proper  disclosure,  listeners  and  viewers  may  believe  that  these 
stories are produced by bona fide news organizations, rather than third-parties who 
may have a vested interest in the content of the story. As a member of the Commis-
sion charged with overseeing the influential and powerful medium of television, this 
issue  is  one  of  great  concern  to  me,  and  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  share  my 
views. 

This  hearing  is  especially  timely  because,  until  recently,  there  appeared  to  be  a 
surprising  lack  of  awareness  that  the  Communications  Act  and  FCC  rules  already 
require  disclosure  by  broadcasters  and  cable  companies  of  who  is  behind  certain 
paid material or political or controversial issue programming. 

Because of the need to highlight our rules, I was especially pleased that we voted 
unanimously last month to remind broadcasters and cable operators of their obliga-
tions  under  the  law.  Under  the  leadership  of  our  new  Chairman,  Kevin  Martin,  we 
came  together  on  a  bipartisan  basis  to  warn  that  we  take  our  responsibilities  seri-
ously  and  plan  to  enforce  the  law  vigorously,  and  sought  comment  to  learn  more 
about how VNRs are used, and whether there is a need for the Commission to refine 
its rules further to protect the public. 

Pre-packaged news stories are attractive to busy newsrooms that are trying to fill 
longer  news  windows  with  fewer  journalistic  resources,  because  they  are  off-the- 
shelf,  ready-to-go  news  stories  that  require  no  expenditure  by  the  news  outlet.  Al-
though  government-produced  pre-packaged  news  stories  have  been  the  focus  of  at-
tention  recently,  private  corporations  also  use  VNRs  to  provide  information  about 
their  products.  Recently,  I’ve  read  reports  about  the  growing  practice  of  companies 
paying  to  guarantee  that  a  media  outlet  will  air  their  pre-packaged  news  stories. 
VNRs are thus one symptom of the growing commercialization of our media. 

We  are  also  seeing  reports  of  a  rising  tide  of  product  placement,  and  I’m  con-
cerned  that  there  seems  to  be  a  lack  of  awareness  of  the  need  for  disclosure  under 
our  rules  in  this  area  as  well.  This  practice  is  likely  to  increase,  given  that  embed-
ding  products  within  programming  is  partly  a  response  to  the  fact  that  technology 
increasingly allows consumers to view television content how and when they choose. 
In  order  to  comply  with  our  rules,  advertisers,  broadcasters  and  cable  operators 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

6 

would be well-served to review our public notice on VNRs, since the same rules can 
apply to product placements. 

In FCC parlance, the issue of ‘‘sponsorship identification’’ dates to the very begin-
ning  of  broadcast  regulation.  Congress  recognized  from  the  outset  that  with  the 
American model of developing broadcast service along private commercial lines, con-
sumers  have  a  right  to  know  who  is  trying  to  persuade  them.  As  far  back  as  the 
Radio Act of 1927, and continuing with the Communications Act of 1934 and subse-
quent  amendments,  Congress  has  maintained  an  unvarying  requirement  that  radio 
and television broadcasters must announce by whom any valuable consideration was 
paid  for  or  furnished.  This  means  that  the  concept  of  sponsorship  identification  is 
in fact older than the FCC itself. 

The  Commission  adopted  its  first  rules  on  sponsorship  identification  in  1944. 
Since  that  time,  our  rules  have  of  course  evolved  some,  but  have  never  deviated 
from  the  core  requirements.  Our  rules  have  always  required  that  whenever  pro-
gramming  is  aired  for  consideration,  the  fact  of  sponsorship  and  the  identity  of  the 
sponsor  must  be  disclosed.  Our  rules  have  also  always  required  that,  in  the  case 
of  controversial  issue  or  political  programming,  whenever  any  material  or  service 
has been furnished to the station as an inducement to broadcast such programming, 
the  fact  that  such  material  or  service  was  furnished  and  the  identity  of  the  source 
be  disclosed.  In  1960,  Congress  generally  excluded  property  or  services  provided  to 
broadcasters free or at nominal charge from the scope of consideration that triggers 
the disclosure requirement—except for controversial issue or political programming. 
As the Commission has acknowledged in the past, disclosure is especially important 
with  this  type  of  programming.  As  a  result,  for  over  sixty  years,  our  rules  have  re-
quired  a  disclosure  to  be  made,  in  the  case  of  controversial  issue  or  political  pro-
gramming,  whenever  any  material  or  service  of  any  kind,  regardless  of  cost,  is  fur-
nished  to  broadcasters  as  an  inducement  to  air  that  programming.  As  recently  as 
2002, the Commission also reiterated that disclosure is particularly important when 
the government is the sponsor of broadcast matter. 

In 1960, Congress also revised section 317 to impose a due diligence requirement 
on  broadcasters  to  obtain  from  their  employees,  and  others  they  deal  with  directly 
in programming, the information they need to make the required sponsorship identi-
fication announcement. The Commission has implemented the express requirements 
of  section  317,  and  has  extended  its  sponsorship  identification  rules  to  cable  opera-
tors  for  ‘‘origination  programming,’’  or  programming  subject  to  their  exclusive  con-
trol. 

The seriousness with which this committee is treating this matter is entirely con-

sistent with the historical concern of the Committee and Congress as a whole. 

In  recent  months—as  evidenced  by  today’s  hearing—much  attention  has  been 
given  to  the  appropriateness  of  Federal  departments  and  agencies  using  pre-pack-
aged  news  without  clear  disclosure  of  the  government’s  role  in  creating  the  VNRs. 
Conflicts  within  the  government  about  whether  this  activity  is  or  is  not  consistent 
with  laws  against  using  appropriated  funds  for  propaganda  have  arisen,  with  the 
Department of Justice and the Government Accountability Office reaching different 
legal  conclusions  on  the  matter.  The  Commission  has  no  direct  jurisdiction  regard-
ing the propaganda laws, and therefore has taken no position on it. I reiterate, how-
ever, that no matter what view one takes in that debate, the Commission itself has 
stated clearly in our recent Public Notice that broadcasters and cable companies do 
have an obligation to disclose the source of political or controversial issue program-
ming  when  the  source  has  furnished  material  to  them  as  an  inducement  for  broad-
casting that programming. 

Legislation  such  as  S.  967,  the  Truth  in  Broadcasting  Act  of  2005,  would  be  an 
effective complement to our existing sponsorship identification rules. The bill would 
explicitly  and  unambiguously  require  Federal  agencies  that  produce  pre-packaged 
news stories to announce, within the news stories themselves, that the government 
is  the  source  of  the  stories.  This  requirement  would  apply  whether  or  not  consider-
ation  was  exchanged,  and  whether  or  not  controversial  or  political  issues  were  in-
volved. The bill would also explicitly and unambiguously prohibit the removal of the 
announcement. This announcement would satisfy the disclosure requirements under 
our rules, such that the bill would not impose any new burden on broadcasters and 
cable companies, and, in fact, would appear to simplify compliance. In sum, the bill 
would ensure that Federal agencies disclose their involvement in pre-packaged news 
stories,  that  broadcasters  and  others  airing  stories  are  aware  of  the  government’s 
involvement,  and,  most  importantly,  that  listeners  and  viewers  understand  the  na-
ture and source of the information being presented. 

Again,  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  testify  today.  I  am  happy  to 

answer any questions you may have. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Now  we  will  hear  from  Mr.  Schlick,  who  is  the  Acting  General 

Counsel for the FCC, please. 

STATEMENT OF AUSTIN C. SCHLICK, ACTING GENERAL 
COUNSEL, FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS COMMISSION 

Mr.  SCHLICK.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Stevens,  Co-Chairman 
Inouye, and good morning, Senator Lautenberg. Thank you for this 
opportunity  to  address  issues  surrounding  video  news  releases,  or 
VNRs. 

As  Commissioner  Adelstein  noted  in  his  testimony,  the  Commis-
sion has adopted rules under the Communications Act that further 
the  public’s  right  to  know  the  source  of  broadcast  programming. 
The Act and the Commission’s implementing rules establish disclo-
sure requirements that apply to sponsored programming regardless 
of  its  source.  Our  rules  are  not  specific  to  Government-sponsored 
programming. 

My testimony this morning will summarize the existing Commu-
nications  Act  provisions  and  FCC  rules  that  apply  to  sponsored 
programming.  I  also  will  describe  the  Commission’s  recent  public 
notice and request for comment on this topic. 

Sections  317  and  507  of  the  Communications  Act  address  spon-
sorship  identification.  Section  317(a)  generally  requires  broadcast 
stations to make an announcement at the time they broadcast any 
material  in  exchange  for  ‘‘valuable  consideration .
. directly  or 
indirectly  paid,  or  promised  to  or  charged  or  accepted  by,  the  sta-
tion so broadcasting.’’ 

.

Section  317(a)(1),  however,  establishes  a  proviso  that  services  or 
property  furnished  without  charge  or  at  a  nominal  charge  for  use 
in  connection  with  a  broadcast  do  not  trigger  this  general  obliga-
tion of mandatory disclosure unless they are furnished in exchange 
for promotional identification in the broadcast. This proviso covers, 
for example, music recordings or video provided without charge for 
use  on  the  air  such  that  there  is  no  disclosure  obligation  if  there 
is no special promotion by the station. 

Consistent  with  the  specific  statutory  authorization  in  section 
317(a)(2), the FCC has provided by rule that sponsorship identifica-
tion  additionally  is  required  and  programming  cannot  be  exempt 
under  the  proviso  in  subsection  (a)(1)  if  the  programming  involves 
political material or discussion of controversial issues of public im-
portance.  In  the  case  of  political  or  controversial  issue  program-
ming, the commission thus requires sponsorship identification even 
when  the  program  material  is  provided  to  the  station  for  free  and 
without any special promotion by the broadcaster. 

Section  507  of  the  act  requires  disclosure  to  the  station  when  a 
station  employee  accepts  consideration  for  the  broadcasted  matter 
over  the  station.  Disclosure  obligations  also  extend  to  those  in-
volved  in  producing,  preparing,  or  supplying  program  matter  that 
is intended for broadcast. A broadcast licensee that receives disclo-
sure  pursuant  to  section  507  must  make  a  sponsorship  identifica-
tion  announcement  even  if  the  licensee  does  not  itself  receive  con-
sideration. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

Under  section  317(c),  a  licensee  also  must  exercise  reasonable 
diligence to obtain sponsorship information from its employees and 
other persons with whom it deals directly. 

Section 317 and the FCC’s rules additionally address the content 
of  sponsorship  announcements.  When  an  announcement  is  re-
quired, the licensee must fully and fairly disclose at the time of the 
broadcast the program matter was sponsored, paid for, or furnished 
and by whom or on whose behalf the consideration was supplied or 
promised. 

Finally,  the  Commission’s  rules  established  for  cable  operators  a 
set of sponsorship identification requirements that are based on the 
requirements for broadcasters under section 317. 

With respect to enforcement, if the commission determines, after 
investigation,  that  an  entity  holding  a  commission  authorization 
has violated the sponsorship identification rules, it may impose ad-
ministrative  sanctions.  Those  sanctions  may  include  monetary  for-
feitures of up to $32,500 per violation and the initiation of a license 
revocation proceeding. 

Section 507 itself establishes civil and criminal penalties for vio-
lation of its disclosure requirements, with a possibility of a fine up 
to $10,000 and as much as a year of imprisonment. 

The FCC recently has received a large number of requests to in-
vestigate  the  use  of  VNRs  by  broadcast  licensees  and  cable  oper-
ations  in  light  of  the  sponsorship  identification  rules.  Several  of 
those requests have come from Members of this Committee. 

On April 13, 2005, the Commission unanimously adopted and re-
leased  a  public  notice  that  reminded  the  industry  and  the  general 
public  of  the  sponsorship  identification  rules.  The  notice  also  re-
quested public comment on issues specifically relating to VNRs and 
whether  there  are  alternative  or  better  means,  in  addition  to  the 
FCC’s current rules, by which the Commission could ensure proper 
disclosure of sponsorship identification. The comment period closes 
on  July  22,  2005.  These  comments  will  help  the  Commission  en-
force sponsorship identification requirements and better assist Con-
gress in its deliberations on this issue. 

I will be happy to answer your questions. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Schlick follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF AUSTIN C. SCHLICK, ACTING GENERAL COUNSEL, 

FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS COMMISSION 

Chairman  Stevens,  Co-Chairman  Inouye,  and  members  of  the  Committee,  thank 
you  for  this  opportunity  to  discuss  issues  surrounding  video  news  releases  (VNRs). 
Consistent  with  the  requirements  of  the  Communications  Act,  the  Commission 
has  adopted  rules  that  further  the  public’s  right  to  know  the  source  of  broadcast 
programming.  The  rules  establish  disclosure  requirements  that  apply  to  sponsored 
programming regardless of its source, and are not specific to government-sponsored 
programming.  I  will  summarize  the  existing  Communications  Act  provisions  and 
FCC  rules  that  apply  to  sponsored  programming.  I  also  will  describe  the  Commis-
sion’s recent issuance of a public notice and request for comment on this topic. 
Statutory Provisions and Rules Governing Sponsorship Identification 

Sections  317  and  507  of  the  Communications  Act  address  sponsorship  identifica-
tion. Section 317(a) generally requires broadcast stations to make an announcement 
at the time they broadcast any material in exchange for ‘‘valuable consideration . . . 
directly  or  indirectly  paid,  or  promised  to  or  charged  or  accepted  by,  the  station  so 
broadcasting.’’  Section  317(a)(1)  includes  an  exception  to  this  general  requirement, 
providing  that  ‘‘ ‘service  or  other  valuable  consideration’  shall  not  include  any  serv-
ice  or  property  furnished  without  charge  or  at  a  nominal  charge  for  use  on,  or  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

connection with, a broadcast unless it is so furnished in consideration for an identi-
fication in a broadcast.’’ 

Section 507 requires disclosure to the station when there is an exchange of consid-
eration  or  an  agreement  to  accept  consideration  involving  a  station  employee.  Dis-
closure  obligations  also  extend  to  those  involved  in  producing,  preparing,  or  sup-
plying  program  matter  that  is  intended  for  broadcast.  If  any  such  person  receives 
or  provides  consideration  for  the  inclusion  of  program  matter,  disclosure  up  the 
chain of distribution is required. A broadcast licensee that receives disclosure pursu-
ant to Section 507 must make a sponsorship identification announcement even if the 
licensee  did  not  itself  receive  consideration.  In  addition,  under  Section  317(c),  a  li-
censee must exercise reasonable diligence to obtain sponsorship information from its 
employees or from other persons with whom it deals directly. 

Section  317  and  the  FCC’s  implementing  rules—which  are  found  at  47  C.F.R. 
§ 73.1212—also  address  the  content  of  sponsorship  announcements  when  they  are 
required. When the licensee airs the program, it must disclose that program matter 
was sponsored, paid for, or furnished, and by whom or on whose behalf the consider-
ation was supplied or promised. 

Under  a  specific  statutory  authorization  in  Section  317(a)(2),  the  FCC  has  estab-
lished  special  disclosure  rules  for  programming  that  involves  political  material  or 
the discussion of a controversial issue of public importance. Political and controver-
sial-issue  programming  is  not  covered  by  an  exception  to  the  disclosure  require-
ments that Congress established in Section 317(a)(1). 

Generally,  as  stated  above,  sponsorship  identification  is  required  where  consider-
ation  is  provided  in  exchange  for  the  broadcast  of  any  material.  However,  as  also 
noted  above,  sponsorship  identification  is  not  necessary  under  Section  317  if  prop-
erty or services that otherwise might qualify as consideration are furnished ‘‘without 
charge or at a nominal charge for use on, or in connection with, [a] broadcast,’’ and 
the provider of the property or services does not receive special on-air identification 
or promotion. This exception covers, for example, music recordings or video provided 
without  charge  for  use  on  the  air,  if  there  is  no  special  promotion  by  the  station. 
In the case of political or controversial issue programming, however, the Commis-
sion has required sponsorship identification even when the program material is pro-
vided  to  the  station  for  free  and  without  any  special  promotion  by  the  broadcaster. 
The FCC’s rules also establish special requirements for sponsorship announcements 
and  record-keeping  in  connection  with  political  or  controversial-issue  programming. 
Finally,  in  Section  76.1615  of  its  rules,  the  Commission  has  established  for  cable 
operators a set of sponsorship identification requirements that are based on the re-
quirements for broadcasters under Section 317. 
Enforcement 

With  respect  to  issues  of  enforcement,  if  the  Commission  determines  after  inves-
tigation that an entity that holds a Commission authorization has violated the spon-
sorship identification rules, it may impose administrative sanctions. Those sanctions 
potentially may include monetary forfeitures of up to $32,500 per violation, and the 
initiation  of  license  revocation  proceedings.  Section  507  itself  establishes  civil  and 
criminal  penalties  for  violation  of  its  disclosure  requirements,  with  the  possibility 
of a fine of up to $10,000 and as much as a year of imprisonment. 
The April 13, 2005 Public Notice 

The FCC has received a large number of requests to investigate the use of VNRs 
by  broadcast  licensees  and  cable  operators  in  light  of  the  sponsorship  identification 
rules. Several of those requests have come from members of this Committee. 

On  April  13,  2005,  the  Commission  unanimously  adopted  and  released  a  Public 
Notice that reminded broadcast licensees, cable operators, and others of their spon-
sorship  identification  obligations.  The  Public  Notice  also  requested  public  comment 
on  various  issues  relating  to  the  use  of  VNRs,  including:  how  VNRs  actually  are 
used  in  programming;  the  terms  on  which  they  are  provided  to  broadcasters  and 
cable  operators;  whether  mechanisms  are  in  place  to  ensure  that  broadcasters  and 
cable  operators  are  notified  about  payments  in  connection  with  the  production  and 
provision  of  VNRs  and  about  the  identity  of  entities  that  provide  political  and  con-
troversial issue material; and whether there are alternative or better means—in ad-
dition  to  the  FCC’s  current  rules—by  which  the  Commission  could  ensure  proper 
disclosure. 

The Commission encourages interested parties to participate in its new proceeding 
on  VNRs  and  to  address  these  questions.  Initial  comments  are  due  on  June  22, 
2005; reply comments are due on July 22, 2005. These comments will help the Com-
mission  enforce  sponsorship  identification  requirements,  and  better  assist  Congress 
in its deliberations on this issue. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

Thank you for this opportunity to discuss the Commission’s sponsorship identifica-
tion rules and the April 13, 2005 Public Notice. I will be happy to answer your ques-
tions. 

The CHAIRMAN. Well, thank you very much. 
Now,  Commissioner  Adelstein,  as  I  understand  it,  on  I  think  it 
was the 15th—what day was it? On the 13th of April, the FCC fin-
ished  an  inquiry  into  VNRs  used  by  broadcasters,  cable,  and  sat-
ellite providers, and it asked for comments on this matter from the 
industry,  with  the  comment  cycle  to  end  on  July  22.  Now,  in  view 
of that request and the Byrd Amendment, which was passed by 99 
votes  on  the  floor  of  the  Senate,  which  provides  for  a  period  be-
tween  now  and  September  30th  of  this  year  that  any  agency  must 
have  a  clear  notification,  what  is  the  rush?  Why  should  we  pass 
other legislation now? 

Mr. ADELSTEIN. Well, it depends on the objectives of Congress. If 
the  concern  is  government  disclosure,  the  Byrd  Amendment,  to 
some extent, would deal with that for this year. It does not, as you 
know, deal with it on a permanent basis because it only applies for 
one  year.  The  Byrd  Amendment  also  does  not  contain  the  level  of 
disclosure  requirement  that  is  contained  in  the  Lautenberg  bill,  S. 
967,  which  requires  that  the  basic  disclosure  run  throughout  the 
entire period of the VNR. 

The CHAIRMAN. But is that not what your commission is looking 
into? You have asked for comments by the industry and they have 
until  July  22  to  respond.  What  is  the  rush?  Why  should  we  have 
an  amendment  adopted  now  or  pass  out  a  bill  now  that,  if  passed, 
would  end  your  investigation  and  we  would  not  know  the  com-
ments  of  the  industry  unless  we  held  a  rather  exhaustive  hearing 
on this bill? 

Mr.  ADELSTEIN.  Again,  it  depends  on  the  objectives  of  Congress. 
We do not have authority currently to compel government agencies 
to  do  anything  regarding  VNRs.  We  only  have  an  obligation  to  en-
sure that broadcasters, if the VNR turns out to be political or con-
troversial, to—— 

The  CHAIRMAN.  But  you  had  the  authority  to  make  the  request 
of  the  industry  to  have  comments  on  a  policy  position  you  unani-
mously adopted. Is that not right? 

Mr. ADELSTEIN. That is correct, yes. 
The CHAIRMAN. Now, you are really asking Congress to interrupt 
that  comment  period  and  to  act  now  before  the  people  involved 
have  expressed  to  the  commission  what  should  be  done  on  this 
issue. 

Mr. ADELSTEIN. Well, I am not necessarily asking Congress. I am 
just informing Congress that if it is interested in disclosure by gov-
ernment  agencies,  we  do  not  have  authority  over  them,  and  I  do 
not  believe  we  are  really  requesting  particular  comment  on  them, 
because  the  law,  as  it  is  currently  structured,  really  only  applies, 
in  this  case,  to  broadcasters’  obligations,  and  we  do  not  have  a 
clear ability to compel Government agencies to disclose. 

If  Government  agencies  determine  that  an  item  is  controversial 
or  political,  if  in  the  judgment  of  broadcasters  it  is  not,  there  is  a 
question  as  to  whether  or  not  it  then  can  air  publicly.  Then  there 
can be a subsequent determination based on complaints that it was 
political. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

The CHAIRMAN. Have there been any comments so far? 
Mr. ADELSTEIN. I have not seen any comments so far, but we do 
have  a  series  of  comments  on  an  earlier  item,  a  notice  of  inquiry, 
that  we  put  out  on  the  localism  issue  regarding  payola,  which  is 
the  same  statute.  We  have  a  number  of  comments  on  that  docket. 
The CHAIRMAN. Well, let me ask Mr. Schlick. We all voted for the 
Byrd Amendment and it was adopted the day after we had the dis-
cussion  here  on  the  Lautenberg  amendment  that  was  offered  to  S. 
714. That provision is very simple really. Unless otherwise author-
ized  by  existing  law,  none  of  the  funds  provided  in  this  act  or  any 
other  act—which  means  it  would  carry  forward  I  think  to  the  end 
of  2006,  but  that  is  another  matter—may  be  used  by  a  Federal 
agency to produce any prepackaged news story unless the story in-
cludes  a  clear  notification  within  the  text  or  audio  of  the  prepared 
packaged  news  that  the  prepackaged  news  story  was  prepared  or 
funded by that Federal agency. 

Now,  Mr.  Schlick,  does  that  not  sort  of  cover  the  situation  right 
now until we figure out what the scope of any rule or authorization 
by Congress to make a rule should be? 

Mr.  SCHLICK.  Mr.  Chairman,  that  legislation,  as  well  as  S.  967, 
addressed  the  specific  question  of  the  production  of  video  news  re-
leases,  and  potentially  other  press  releases,  by  Government.  Our 
rules are targeted, and the central provisions I have described, sec-
tion  317  and  507,  are  targeted,  at  the  obligations  of  broadcasters 
who present the programming and the public’s right to know at the 
time  of  the  broadcast  who  it  is  who  is  speaking  to  persuade  them. 
So  they  address  different  questions,  and  it  is  a  policy  question  for 
Congress the extent to which it chooses to additionally regulate the 
production  specifically  by  the  Government.  Our  rules  apply  gen-
erally regardless of the source of the programming. 

The CHAIRMAN. Well, but this says no agency can use any money 
that it gets from any act of Congress to produce any such story un-
less there is notification. What is wrong with that? 

Mr.  SCHLICK.  Again,  Mr.  Chairman,  these  are  policy  questions 
before  Congress  at  this  point  and  the  FCC’s  responsibility  is  the 
administration of the statutory requirements that already exist and 
apply  generally  to  licensees  in  particular,  as  well  as  those  who 
produce programming that is ultimately broadcast. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Do  you  agree  with  me  that  that  says  no  agency 

is going to produce those during this year with Federal funds? 

Mr. SCHLICK. That is my reading, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Chairman,  may  I  ask  a  question  about 
your  inquiry?  You  indicated  that  you  felt  the  Byrd  Amendment 
would  apply  to  the  next  fiscal  year?  It  was  offered  to  the  supple-
mental, and my expectation—— 

The CHAIRMAN. It says 2005, but if another act comes along that 
contains  funds  before  this  law  expires,  I  take  it  it  would  apply  to 
those funds too. We think it expires on September 30th but it may 
carry forward. 

Senator DORGAN. This year. 
The CHAIRMAN. Yes. 
Senator  DORGAN.  Well,  that  is  my  understanding  because  the 

supplemental deals with this fiscal year—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

The CHAIRMAN. But it says, or any other act. So there is a ques-

tion there how far it goes forward. 

Senator Inouye. 
Senator  INOUYE.  Mr.  Adelstein,  under  the  Communications  Act, 
you  indicated  that  there  are  a  lot  of  private  companies  who  are 
paying media outlets to guarantee that their prepackaged news sto-
ries are carried? 

Mr. ADELSTEIN. That is correct. 
Senator INOUYE. Now, who has the obligation to provide the dis-
closure  that  this  is  prepackaged?  Is  it  the  one  distributing  or  the 
one broadcasting? 

Mr.  ADELSTEIN.  In  this  case  it  would  apply  to  both.  Section  507 
of  the  Communications  Act  requires  that  anybody  involved  in  the 
distribution  chain  who  pays  for  the  placement  of  any  material  on 
broadcast  airwaves  has  an  obligation  to  report  that  to  the  broad-
caster  or  to  the  person  with  whom  they  are  dealing  at  the  broad-
cast station. So 507 obligations apply both to the distributor of the 
VNR,  as  well  as  to  the  broadcast  entity  which,  in  response  to  the 
report that it gets from somebody who pays for that purpose or has 
knowledge of it, is required under law to disclose the source of that 
material. 

Senator  INOUYE.  Would  that  obligation  apply  to  the  Lautenberg 

provision? 

Mr.  ADELSTEIN.  It  would  not  because  the  Lautenberg  provision 
actually covers it from the outset. Because the disclosure would be 
within the VNR, it automatically takes care of the need by the gov-
ernment  to  disclose.  Of  course,  in  this  case,  the  government  gen-
erally does not provide any consideration in exchange for it, but the 
Lautenberg provision deals with all the broadcaster’s obligations. If 
that legislation is adopted, then there is no need for any disclosure 
because it is already within the VNR itself. 

Senator INOUYE. In the disclosure, who determines what is polit-

ical in nature or controversial? 

Mr.  ADELSTEIN.  Well,  in  the  first  instance,  it  is  determined  by 
the  broadcasters  themselves.  We  are,  under  the  law  and  under 
court precedent, obligated to try to defer to the reasonable interpre-
tations of a broadcaster. If we receive a complaint that a particular 
kind  of  VNR  is  political,  then  we  investigate  it  and  have  to  deter-
mine basically whether or not it was a reasonable use of discretion. 
We  do  not  determine  whether  or  not  we  think  it  is  political—rath-
er,  we  determine  whether  or  not  the  broadcaster,  in  saying  that  it 
was not political, was exercising reasonable judgment. 

Senator  INOUYE.  So  then  the  final  word  is  with  the  broadcaster? 
Mr.  ADELSTEIN.  The  final  word  is  with  us  and  then  with  the 
courts, but the broadcaster has the initial word. They have to make 
the initial determination. 

Senator INOUYE. Have you ever had this experience? 
Mr. ADELSTEIN. Not in my tenure there. I believe that there have 
been  court  cases  that  have  affirmed  our  right  to  do  so.  Occasion-
ally,  the  courts  have  actually  overturned  the  FCC  on  individual 
court  cases  saying  that  we  did  not  give  sufficient  deference  to 
broadcasters in their determination as to what was reasonable. But 
generally  speaking,  the  courts  have  upheld  the  constitutionality  of 
this approach. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Senator  INOUYE.  Do  you  have  many  allegations  of  violations  in 

13 

your files? 

Mr. ADELSTEIN. We do not have a lot. This year we have a much 
larger  amount  than  we  normally  have.  The  Armstrong  Williams 
situation  and  the  whole  VNR  situation  has  led  to,  I  think,  57,000 
complaints.  We  received  18,000  complaints  involving  the  Arm-
strong  Williams  matter,  but  generally  speaking,  there  are  much 
fewer than that every year. 

Senator  INOUYE.  Well,  Mr.  Chairman,  I  will  wait  for  another 

time. I am finished. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Pardon  me.  I  was  trying  to  find  out  what  the 

Armstrong Williams matter was. I was showing my ignorance. 

Mr. ADELSTEIN. There were allegations that Armstrong Williams 

violated section 507 and 317 by speaking—— 

The CHAIRMAN. Because he was paid? 
Mr.  ADELSTEIN.  Because  he  was  paid  and  it  was  not  disclosed. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Lautenberg. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks, Mr. Chairman. 
The  one  thing  I  would  appreciate,  Commissioner  Adelstein,  is  if 
you  would  confirm  the  fact  that  the  FCC  rule  that  is  now  in  place 
only  affects  industry.  It  does  not  affect  government.  Am  I  correct? 
Mr. ADELSTEIN. Well, in terms of the disclosure requirement, our 

disclosure requirements go to the broadcaster. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. And you were very clear. Just for the edifi-
cation of my colleagues, I wanted to make certain that we are plac-
ing  no  additional  burden  on  the  broadcasters  with  our  bill.  All  we 
say  is  to  the  government  very  simply,  just  say  that  it  is  a  product 
of  the  U.S.  Government.  And  the  notion  that  maybe  they  do  not 
want  to  do  it  suggests  that  it  is  designed  to  deceive.  That  is  my 
interpretation. 

I want to confirm something else, Mr. Adelstein, and that is that 
the Byrd Amendment does expire on 9/30/05, as is written. That is 
clearly  the  condition.  Now,  the  Chairman  raises  an  issue  about 
whether or not it could have life after. I cannot think of any reason 
why  we  would  want  to  proceed  with  something  that  leaves  such 
questions. What is in the public interest for the government to hide 
its role in the production and distribution of these news stories? 

Mr.  ADELSTEIN.  Well,  the  FCC  actually  on  two  occasions,  as  re-
cently  as  2002,  has  stated  very  clearly  that  the  government  is,  in 
fact,  held  to  almost  a  higher  standard.  I  will  read  to  you  from  the 
1977  case  that  was  reiterated  in  2002  from  the  FCC  as  a  unani-
mous  body.  ‘‘We  believe  that  the  public  is  particularly  entitled  to 
know  when  the  Government  is  using  tax  dollars  to  persuade  it.’’ 
That has been the FCC policy. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  But,  again,  the  omission  of  that  kind  of 
identification or disclaimer is very clear that it is designed to pub-
licize  or  propagandize  the  issue.  Otherwise,  there  could  be  no  rea-
son for withholding a disclaimer. It does not serve the public inter-
est at all not to be aware of the fact that this is a Government pub-
lication. Am I correct? 

Mr.  ADELSTEIN.  Well,  you  can  certainly  make  that  argument.  I 
think that it is very important that the public knows if the Govern-
ment  is  behind  something.  In  the  case  of  political  or  controversial 
programming,  of  course,  it  is  already  required  to  be  disclosed,  but 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

the problem is that if we do not have this rule in place in advance, 
there is a judgment call as to whether or not something is political 
or  controversial,  and  something  could  air  and  then  complaints 
could  arise.  Subsequently,  we  could  find  that  it  should  have  been 
disclosed but it was not. But at that point it has already been basi-
cally  run  on  the  air,  and  the  people  have  seen  it.  It  is  too  late  to 
take that harm back. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  When  commercial  sources  produce  VNRs, 
which  are  used,  they  are  always  designed  to  enhance  a  product  or 
enhance a position or enhance a skill. And there is no doubt about 
who produces it. They want it to be known as their production. Am 
I correct? 

Mr.  ADELSTEIN.  Well,  in  many  cases,  actually,  private  commer-
cial  entities  do  not  want  it  known  that  they  are  behind  it  because 
if  they  can  avoid  that,  then  it  is  seen  as  much  more  legitimate.  It 
looks  like  a  news  story.  They  are  designed  to  mimic  news  stories, 
and  it  comes  with  the  credibility  of  a  news  story.  So  if  they  can 
hide  the  fact  that  it  is  actually  a  hidden  advertisement,  I  think  it 
makes it actually more effective from a PR perspective. That is why 
we  need  to  be  so  vigilant,  to  make  sure  the  public  knows  who  is 
behind it. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Yes.  But  that  is  part  of  your  supervision 
and  responsibility,  to  make  sure  people  know  from  whence  these 
products come. Right? 

Mr. ADELSTEIN. Right. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. What burden do you see Government hav-
ing as a result of the legislation that we have proposed here? Could 
you imagine it would have any additional cost to Government? 

Mr. ADELSTEIN. It does not seem particularly costly to run a dis-
closure  along  those  lines,  and  it  would  prevent  some  of  the  confu-
sion that we currently are seeing. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I  want  to  be  sure  that  this  disclaimer 
could  be  as  simple  as  ‘‘made  for  or  paid  for  by  the  U.S.  Govern-
ment,’’  just  in  small  print  underneath  large  enough  to  see  from  a 
reasonable distance. So not having it would seem to me to have an 
overt mission, and that is to help confuse people about the fact that 
this  is,  again,  a  Government  program  to  politicize  or  to  publicize 
something. 

As  I  said  before,  this  is  not  new  and  we  all  know  that.  It  has 
been  used  in  the  past  by,  I  think  it  is  fair  to  say,  Democratic  Ad-
ministrations as well as Republican. But if one sees people passing 
a red light and lots of people doing it, you do not say eliminate red 
lights  and  that  would  take  care  of  things.  Not  at  all.  That  usually 
makes you more energetic to enforce these things. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I  hope  it  is  clearly  understood  that  we  are  not 
looking  to  place  additional  burdens  on  the  FCC  or  on  the  broad-
casters or on industry generally. It is just a question of fairness for 
the citizens. 

Thanks, Mr. Chairman. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  This  Senator  remembers  so  often  that  the  last 
Administration  put  out  VNRs  about  my  State  and  how  it  was  so 
pristine  and  how  it  should  not  be  disturbed.  They  were  hawking 
the extreme environmental position to oppose us on the Arctic Na-
tional  Wildlife  Refuge,  to  oppose  us  on  drilling,  to  oppose  us  on  so 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

many  things.  I  would  love  to  have  that  disclosed.  You  better  be-
lieve.  There  is  no  question  in  my  mind  I  would  like  everyone  to 
know where that propaganda comes from. 

So  the  question  is  not  that.  The  question  is  your  bill  and  what 

it does, and that is what we are trying to figure out. 

Senator Dorgan. 

STATEMENT OF HON. BYRON L. DORGAN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NORTH DAKOTA 

Senator DORGAN. Mr. Chairman, thank you very much. 
First, let me thank the representatives from the FCC. 
My  attention  to  these  issues,  I  would  say,  Mr.  Chairman,  came 
from the Armstrong Williams situation. I was startled to learn that 
one  of  our  agencies  in  the  Federal  Government  had  paid  a  syn-
dicated  columnist  $240,000  in  order  to  promote  the  Administra-
tion’s  No  Child  Left  Behind  agenda.  That  contract  was  not  dis-
closed  to  the  public.  We  learned  it  only  because  USA  Today  filed 
a Freedom of Information Act request and got a document that told 
us  this  agency,  the  Department  of  Education,  had  engaged  with  a 
syndicated  columnist  and  paid  him  nearly  a  quarter  of  a  million 
dollars.  As  a  result,  that  columnist  wrote  good  things  about  No 
Child  Left  Behind,  had  television  programs  that  trumpeted  No 
Child  Left  Behind.  It  was  kind  of  journalism  for  hire  and  I  think 
is  kind  of  the  underbelly  of  the  way  journalism  would  act  in  these 
areas. 

I  think  journalism  is  a  wonderful  occupation.  Most  journalists 
take  very  seriously  their  responsibilities,  but  this  was  clearly  be-
yond  the  pale  and  I  think  startled  everybody.  It  was  part  of  a  $1 
million deal, as I understand. This payment to Armstrong Williams 
for $240,000 was part of a $1 million deal with the Ketchum public 
relations  firm  that  was  contracted  to  produce  video  news  releases 
as well. 

Let  me  say  that  my  colleague  from  New  Jersey  was  accurate 
when he said this is not just about this Administration. It has hap-
pened  before,  but  all  of  us  ought  to  be  concerned—and  I  think  we 
all  are—about  making  sure  people  understand  where  information 
comes from. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Senator,  this  does  not  amend  the  payola  legisla-

tion. 

Senator DORGAN. No, I understand that. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  That  is  already  being  investigated  and  it  is  al-

ready against the law. 

Senator  DORGAN.  I  understand  that.  My  point  is  the  origin  of 
this controversy was developed with Armstrong Williams being dis-
closed on the front pages of our newspapers, a syndicated columnist 
who was paid $240,000 to promote something that he then used in 
his  columns  and  on  his  television  show.  From  that,  then  we  got 
into this discussion about the video news releases and other issues. 
That is the reason I think that prompted the Byrd Amendment and 
it  has  also  prompted  a  bill  here  in  the  Senate,  on  which  we  have 
a hearing today. 

I do want to ask a question about concentration in the media. My 
sense is that much of the use of video news releases by newsrooms 
who  normally  would  not  use  that  is  now  coming  because  of  addi-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

tional concentration in the media where the bigger enterprises are, 
at  least,  beginning  to  take  apart  newsrooms  and  newsrooms  are 
more likely to say, yes, give me some VNRs. I can just fill my space 
with video news releases. I would like to ask Mr. Adelstein wheth-
er  that  is  your  judgment  as  well,  and  is  there  evidence  to  support 
that? 

Mr.  ADELSTEIN.  Well,  there  does  appear  to  be.  A  lot  of  analysts 
believe that there is increasing pressure on these newsrooms. They 
are  finding  less  and  less  resources,  and  in  fact,  sometimes  they 
have  to  fill  longer  news  windows.  Increasingly,  according  to  many 
reports,  they  are  filling  them  with  things  like  VNRs  that  are  cre-
ated by somebody else. These come at no cost to the broadcast enti-
ty. The issue is that these companies are under increasing pressure 
to  meet  quarterly  earnings  reports.  They  are  chasing  the  bottom 
line  and  it  is  extremely  competitive.  If  they  can  shave  a  little  of 
money  off  here  or  there,  we  are  seeing  them  do  that.  You  are  see-
ing  the  boundary  and  the  line  between  news  and  information  in-
creasingly blurred, more sensationalism, and less serious news and 
coverage of what is happening in local communities. 

Senator DORGAN. If I may say, the Project for Excellence in Jour-
nalism  did  an  analysis,  which  included  1998  to  2002,  which  would 
have included both Administrations, and they were trying to evalu-
ate  with  local  news  directors  what  kind  of  use  of  video  news  re-
leases  was  being  done  and  what  kind  of  information  was  disclosed 
about  that.  They  found  a  quarter  to  a  third  of  news  directors 
showed  video  news  releases  and  disclosed  the  source  occasionally, 
rarely, or never. So that is pretty substantial. 

There  is  a  great  op-ed  piece  about  this  by  Marion  Just,  a  pro-
fessor  of  political  science  at  Wellesley  College,  and  the  Director  of 
the  Project  for  Excellence  in  Journalism.  I  will  just  read  one  para-
graph. I happen to share this view. 

‘‘Local broadcasters are being asked to do more with less.’’ These 
are  quotes.  ‘‘And  they  have  been  forced  to  rely  more  on  pre-
packaged  news  to  take  up  the  slack.  So  we  do  not  have  to  search 
very  far  to  discover  why  the  Administration  has  succeeded  so  well 
in  getting  its  news  releases  on  the  air.  The  public  companies  that 
own  TV  stations  are  so  intent  on  increasing  their  stock  price  and 
pleasing  their  shareholders  that  they  are  squeezing  the  news  out 
of the news business.’’ 

That  means  there  is  a  much  more  receptive  environment  for  the 
use of VNRs and I think makes it even more important that there 
be  full  disclosure.  That  is  why  I  have  supported  the  Lautenberg- 
Kerry proposal and think that the Congress does need to act. 

Mr. Chairman, thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Kerry. 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN F. KERRY, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM MASSACHUSETTS 

Senator KERRY. Mr. Chairman, thanks a lot for holding the hear-
ing.  I  apologize  for  being  late,  but  we  have  the  Bolton  nomination 
before  the  Committee  and  I  am  going  to  have  to  go  back  to  that 
at some point. 

I just want to make a couple comments and see if we cannot find 

some common ground here. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

There  is  no  question  that  Federal  agencies  are  increasingly  pro-
ducing  and  distributing  literally  hundreds  of  so-called  video  news 
releases.  This  is  agency-wide  and  hundreds  of  them  are  going  out 
now.  Most  often  these  segments  are  broadcast  with  no  disclosure 
at  all  that  they  were  written  or  produced  by  the  Federal  Govern-
ment. 

I  heard  you  saying  just  as  we  came  in—and  I  think  it  is  gen-
erally accepted here that the Federal Government should not be in 
the  business  of  manipulating  public  opinion  with  fake  news  re-
ports, with news reports that appear to be official news reports and 
they  are  not,  paid  for  by  public  dollars,  created  by  public  relations 
experts,  broadcast  without  proper  disclosure,  all  of  which  the 
American  taxpayer  is  funding  without  even  knowing  that  this  is 
not a legitimate news report they are seeing. 

And they are pretty slick. We all know they are geared and done 
in a way that makes it look like it is a reporter interviewing some-
body. It has a purpose, and the purpose, I regret, is not just to in-
form. It is also to leave people with the impression that this is sort 
of  a  news  station  or  a  legitimate  part  of  the  currency  of  our  news. 
All  of  us  cherish  that.  We  cherish  the  independence  of  the  flow 

of information in America. We have laws about propaganda. 

So it is not a partisan issue. I want to emphasize that. I was not 
aware  but  we  learned  and  were  equally  shocked  to  know  that  this 
was  going  on  in  the  Clinton  Administration.  I  was  not  aware  of 
that.  I  think  that  shows  the  problem.  It  sort  of  underscores  that 
it is inappropriate for anybody to be doing it. 

So  we  also  know  that  the  Senate  unanimously  supported  the 
Byrd Amendment to the supplemental appropriations bill. In short, 
Democrats  and  Republicans  have  come  together  recognizing  the 
problem  and  wanting  to  be  part  of  the  solution.  But  the  Byrd 
Amendment  is  only  a  temporary  fix.  It  is  a  1-year  deal.  It  expires 
on  September  30th  of  this  year.  And  the  Commerce  Committee 
needs  to,  obviously,  look  at  the  oversight  role  of  the  FCC,  the  in-
dustry  that  is  involved,  and  the  conflicting  legal  interpretations 
that we have from GAO and the Administration. It is our responsi-
bility  to  try  to  come  up  with  a  piece  of  legislation  that  deals  with 
it. 

Now, that is why Senator Lautenberg and I have joined together 
to  put  this  bill  together.  It  simply  requires  that  any  prepackaged 
news  story  that  is  produced  by  a  Federal  agency  identify  the  U.S. 
Government  as  the  source  of  the  story.  I  know  the  majority,  your 
staff,  Mr.  Chairman,  has  worked  closely  with  ours  to  try  to  come 
up and see if we cannot craft language that is acceptable. 

It  is  pretty  simple.  It  is  pretty  straightforward.  The  operative 
section  is  really  section  342,  line  8,  and  it  says  very  simply:  ‘‘Dis-
claimer  Required.  Any  prepackaged  news  story  produced  by  or  on 
behalf of a Federal agency that is broadcast or distributed by a net-
work organization, broadcast licensee or permittee, or multichannel 
video  programming  distributor  in  the  United  States  shall  contain 
an  announcement  supplied  by  the  Federal  agency’’—that  is  very 
important—‘‘within the prepackaged news story that conspicuously 
identifies  the  U.S.  Government  as  the  source  for  the  prepackaged 
news story.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

We are not requiring the broadcaster to do this. We are requiring 
the  Federal  agency  to  do  this.  The  agency,  which  we  have  every 
right  in  the  world  to  make  a  requirement  as  to  appropriate  disclo-
sure,  is  required  to  put  the  disclosure  on  it.  So  there  is  no  inter-
ference  with  the  broadcaster’s  rights,  et  cetera.  It  is  simply  ac-
knowledging  the  truth  of  what  the  broadcaster  is  being  given  to 
broadcast  at  the  expense  of  the  American  taxpayer,  at  the  behest 
of a Federal agency. It is that simple. 

And  there  is  a  page  of  some  definitions.  We  can  work  on  them 

if there are problems in the definitions. 

ernment. 

But  every  American  is  entitled  to  know  the  source  of  pre-
packaged information that is broadcast and characterized as news. 
Otherwise, the viewing public is being misled and we are engaging 
in  official  propaganda.  Every  taxpayer  has  a  right  to  know  if  their 
tax dollars have been used to produce the so-called news that they 
are watching. 

Now,  I  asked  the  FCC  to  investigate  this,  and  last  month  the 
FCC  launched  a  public  comment  period  to  look  at  the  VNRs,  and 
that  is  a  positive  step.  But  FCC  Commissioner  Adelstein  said  at 
the  time  that  the  appropriateness  of  Government-produced  news 
segments and disputes among the branches of the Federal Govern-
ment is ultimately an issue for Congress to decide. We have got to 
decide this. 

The problem is we have conflicting views within the Federal Gov-

The  GAO  found  that  the  Federal  agencies  should  not  produce 
prepackaged  news  reports  that  ‘‘conceal  or  do  not  clearly  identify 
for the television viewing audience that the agency was the source 
of  those  materials  because  they  violate  existing  laws  dealing  with 
propaganda.’’ 

The Justice Department in what I believe—and I think any com-
mon  sense  interpretation  by  any  member  of  this  committee  would 
have  to  agree—is  really  a  sort  of  tortured  legal  analysis  which 
likens  a  prepackaged  news  story  to  nothing  more  than  a  print 
press  release.  Well,  that  is  just  ridiculous  on  its  face.  The  source 
of  a  press  release  is  absolutely  clear  in  the  title  and  heading  of  a 
press release. More important, as far as I know, in a press release 
no  one  pretends  to  be  somebody  else.  It  comes  from  a  specific  per-
son.  No  actor  pretends  to  be  a  reporter.  No  actor  pretends  to  be  a 
citizen.  In  short,  a  press  release  does  and  should  state  a  point  of 
view,  but  a  press  release  does  not  intentionally  hide  its  source  or 
the  identity  of  the  speakers.  So  a  press  release  is  not  fake  news. 
A news clip, prepackaged and produced without disclaimer, is. 

The White House has, frankly, attempted to split hairs with this 
complicated legal interpretation that says to the agencies go ahead 
and continue to deceive the public and you can continue to deceive 
broadcasters  and  you  can  continue  to  produce  false  news  stories. 
Well,  that  is  just  not  right,  and  I  think  every  one  of  us  knows  it 
is not right. 

I  am  open  to  any  suggestions  as  to  how  we  find  the  appropriate 
language,  but  it  is  critical  to  have  some  form  of  disclosure  that 
leaves  no  doubt  in  the  mind  of  the  American  public  what  is  hap-
pening. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Now,  I  know  I  have  used  my  time.  I  will  go  in  the  next  round 

19 

with any questions I have. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  If  the  Senator  has  to  leave,  I  will  be  pleased  to 

let you ask questions now, if you wish. 

Senator KERRY. Well, I thank the Chairman. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  I  only  want  to  make  one  statement,  Senator 
Kerry.  I  do  not  know  that  there  has  been  any  allegations  of  any 
false news stories here. That allegation is new to me. 

Senator  KERRY.  Well,  fake  news  in  the  sense,  Mr.  Chairman—I 
understand what you are saying. It may well be that what they are 
putting  out  is  true.  I  understand  that.  That  is  not  what  I  am  say-
ing.  But  if  it  is  not  a  reporter  appearing  to  be  a  reporter,  it  is  by 
definition fake, even if the news is true. 

Often  it  is  very  one-sided.  I  have  seen  some  of  the  clips  and  the 
news  is  often  very  one-sided.  It  has  no  counterpoint  of  view,  and 
sometimes  the  facts  are,  in  fact,  incorrect,  and  we  can  document 
that.  So  I  think  the  key  here  is  really  getting  at  the  disclosure, 
which  raises  the  standard  of  truth-telling  at  the  same  time  as  you 
do that. 

But I thank you for letting me ask a couple questions. 
Acting  Counsel  Schlick,  would  the  disclosures  of  the  Truth  in 
Broadcasting  Act,  as  currently  set  out,  meet  the  terms  outlined  in 
your  April  13,  2005  public  notice?  Would  what  we  have  set  out 
meet those terms that you set out? 

Mr.  SCHLICK.  Your  legislation,  Senator,  addresses  a  somewhat 
different  question.  It  might  be  helpful  for  me  to  contrast  our  cur-
rent  rules,  which  were  the  subject  of  that  public  notice,  from  S. 
967. 

As  applied  to  video  news  releases—our  current  rules  track  very 
closely quite detailed provisions in section 317 and 507 of the Com-
munications  Act.  So  applying  those  provisions  in  section  317,  the 
rules  generally  do  not  require  disclosure  of  sponsorship  identifica-
tion,  unless  there  is  some  consideration  exchanged  in  addition  to 
just  the  provision  of  the  programming  or  the  video  news  release, 
or  unless  the  broadcaster  gives  some  special  identification  in  ex-
change for the programming. 

Senator KERRY. Can I stop you there for a minute? 
Mr. SCHLICK. Yes. 
Senator  KERRY.  Your  public  notice  says  that  broadcasters  ‘‘gen-
erally  must  clearly  disclose  to  members  of  their  audience  the  na-
ture,  source,  and  sponsorship  of  the  material  that  they  are  view-
ing.’’ Correct? 

Mr. SCHLICK. That is correct. 
Senator  KERRY.  Now  you  are  telling  me  that  that  is  limited  ex-

clusively to where there is an exchange of money. 

Mr.  SCHLICK.  Under  section  317,  there  is  a  proviso  which  Con-
gress added in 1960. Specifically, the controversy at that time was 
the payola and—— 

Senator  KERRY.  I  agree.  But  the  interest  is  not.  The  interest  we 
are  trying  to  get  at  is  not  defined  by  the  exchange  of  money.  It  is 
defined  in  the  act  of  putting  out  the  news.  Correct?  The  disclosure 
is for a purpose. 

Mr. SCHLICK. As I understand, Senator, that is right. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

Senator  KERRY.  Why  would  the  disclosure  be  limited  to  an  ex-

change of money? 

Mr.  SCHLICK.  I  am  describing  existing  law,  Senator,  and  under 
existing  law,  if  the  programming  is  not  political  or  controversial— 
and that is—— 

Senator  KERRY.  But  that  is  not  what  I  am  asking  you.  What  I 
am  asking  you  is  whether  what  we  have  set  out  would  meet  the 
terms  of  your  requirement  on  disclosure,  leaving  out  the  money. 
Just  does  it  meet  the  terms  of  the  nature,  source,  sponsorship  of 
material? 

Mr.  SCHLICK.  If  sponsorship  identification  is  required  under  our 
rules,  then  certainly  the  labeling  required  by  S.  967  should  satisfy 
that  requirement.  Right  now  our  statute  that  we  implement  does 
not require sponsorship identification in a number of instances that 
would be covered by S. 967. 

Senator  KERRY.  I  understand  that,  which  is  precisely  the  sort  of 
hole  that  we  are  looking  at  plugging  here  right  now.  But  what  I 
am  trying  to  get  at  is,  is  the  terminology  that  we  have  set  forth 
adequate  to  require  disclosure  of  the  nature,  source,  and  sponsor-
ship  of  the  material  they  are  viewing?  It  would  meet  the  standard 
of disclosure that you have set out, would it not? 

Mr. SCHLICK. I think it would, Senator. 
Senator  KERRY.  Commissioner  Adelstein,  FCC  rules  specify  ‘‘a 
greater obligation of disclosure in connection with political material 
and program matter dealing with controversial issues.’’ Correct? 

Mr. ADELSTEIN. That is right. 
Senator  KERRY.  What  guidelines  determine  whether  the  subject 

matter of a VNR or ANR is political or controversial? 

Mr.  ADELSTEIN.  Well,  it  would  really  be  guided  by  case  law. 
There  is  a  series  of  decisions  that  we  made  mostly  under  the  fair-
ness  doctrine,  which  has  since  been  done  away  with  by  the  FCC, 
but there is very serious case law. 

I  mentioned  earlier  that  there  is  a  requirement  that  we  defer  to 
the broadcaster’s initial determination as to whether or not it is po-
litical or controversial. And if there are complaints raised that they 
made an incorrect assessment in the first instance, we go back and 
look into that and determine whether or not we think it was a rea-
sonable  assessment  by  the  broadcaster  that  it  was  political  or  not. 
The problem is that if we make that determination later, the infor-
mation has already been broadcast over the air. The public has al-
ready seen it, and the harm is already done. 

Senator KERRY. So, in other words, it is complicated and unclear. 

It depends on the case law and it is sort of up in the air. 

Mr. ADELSTEIN. That is right. 
Senator  KERRY.  So  my  question  to  you  is,  would  full  disclosure 
of  the  Government  as  the  source  for  all  audio  and  video  material, 
as  proposed  in  the  Truth  in  Broadcasting  Act,  not  guard  against 
taxpayer-funded  publicity  or  propaganda  without  requiring  any 
kind  of  complicated  oversight  regulatory  system?  It  is  pretty 
straightforward. 

Mr.  ADELSTEIN.  It  would  greatly  simplify  it  because  I  think  it  is 
difficult  for  a  broadcaster  to  determine  if  some  of  these  things  are 
controversial. They do not want to spend the time digging through 
the case law. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

Senator  KERRY.  Well,  it  all  depends  on  the  legal  interpretation. 
Mr. ADELSTEIN. Right. 
Senator  KERRY.  So  you  get  into  a  lack  of  clarity  that  winds  up 

leading to misinterpretation. 

Mr.  ADELSTEIN.  You  already  see  a  distinction  between  GAO  and 

OMB as to what the interpretation is. 

Senator KERRY. It seems to me that this is really one of the sim-
plest  things  that  we  get  to  deal  with  around  here.  We  have  a  lot 
of  complicated  issues  to  deal  with,  but  this  is  pretty  straight-
forward.  Either  the  Government  is  funding  stuff  legitimately  and 
letting  people  know  it  or  it  should  not  be  because  it  is  deceptive 
and  subject  to,  obviously,  political  interpretation.  If  you  have  dis-
closure,  which  is  the  right  of  the  American  people  to  know  the 
source of news, where it is coming from, if it is news, they can dis-
count it. It does not say you cannot do it. It just says you have got 
to know where it is coming from. Is that not a pretty fair and sim-
ple standard? 

Mr.  ADELSTEIN.  That  is  the  principle  that  has  been  embodied  in 
legislation  that  has  been  approved  by  this  committee  and  by  Con-
gress  since  1927.  In  an  unwavering  series  of  laws,  the  Congress 
has  always  required  disclosure  of  material  like  this  so  that  the 
public  knows  who  is  trying  to  influence  it.  So  this  would  be  con-
sistent with that history. 

Senator  KERRY.  Has  self-regulation  of  broadcasters  ever  proven 

adequate? 

Mr. ADELSTEIN. That is a broad question. In this case, there does 
appear to be a loosening of the way that people are behaving. That 
is why it was so important we came together on a bipartisan basis 
to  alert  broadcasters  and  everybody  in  industry  of  their  legal  obli-
gations because I think there was a lack of awareness about it. 

Senator KERRY. This is a question for both of you, my last ques-
tion  for  now.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  would  love  to  be  able  to  submit  a 
few questions in writing, if it is possible. 

The CHAIRMAN. Yes, sir. We have four other witnesses. 
Senator  KERRY.  I  know  that.  So  the  last  question  is  could  the 
FCC,  Library  of  Congress,  or  the  National  Archives,  any  one  of 
them, take on the creation and maintenance of a publicly accessible 
central archive of all Government-funded VNRs? 

Mr.  ADELSTEIN.  It  seems  that  would  be  a  simple  thing  for  Con-

gress to set up. 

Senator KERRY. Mr. Schlick? 
Mr. SCHLICK. I imagine it would be possible, yes, Senator. 
Senator KERRY. Do you think it is useful? I mean, if the Govern-
ment  is  funding  all  of  these  things,  is  it  not  important  to  have 
some  sort  of  central  repository?  People  can  have  accountability  for 
them. 

Mr.  ADELSTEIN.  You  could  make  them  available  online.  That 
would make it very easy for people to access and know where they 
come  from.  That  would  be  another  form  of  disclosure  that  could 
complement the kind of disclosure required by S. 967. 

Senator KERRY. Do you want to comment or not, Mr. Schlick? 
Mr. SCHLICK. No. I would agree with Commissioner Adelstein. 
Senator KERRY. Great. Thank you very much. Thank you, gentle-

men. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
In  the  interest  of  time,  thank  you  very  much,  gentlemen.  I  have 
asked  Senator  DeMint  if  he  wanted  to  ask  questions  now,  but  be-
cause  of  the  time  constraint,  I  ask  that  the  next  four  witnesses 
come  to  the  table.  We  will  listen  to  all  four  of  you  and  then  have 
questions, to the extent we can, before the votes start. 

The next four witnesses are Ms. Susan Poling, the Managing As-
sociate  General  Counsel  of  the  GAO;  Ms.  Barbara  Cochran,  Presi-
dent,  Radio-Television  News  Directors  Association;  Mr.  Douglas 
Simon, President and CEO of Simon Productions Incorporated; Ms. 
Judith  Turner  Phair,  President  and  Chief  Executive  Officer  of  the 
Public  Relations  Society  of  America.  We  appreciate  all  of  you  com-
ing. I do hope you understand our problem here. 

Ms.  Poling,  let  us  begin  with  you,  if  you  will.  You  are  from  the 

GAO. Is that right? 
STATEMENT  OF  SUSAN  A.  POLING,  MANAGING  ASSOCIATE 
GENERAL  COUNSEL,  OFFICE  OF  GENERAL  COUNSEL, 
GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE 
Ms.  POLING.  I  am.  Good  morning,  Chairman  Stevens,  Senator— 
well,  I  do  not  see  Senator  Inouye  right  now—and  members  of  the 
Committee. My name is Susan Poling and I am responsible for the 
appropriations  law  decisions  and  opinions  at  the  GAO.  I  am  hon-
ored to be here today to discuss our recent legal opinions regarding 
the  use  of  prepackaged  news  stories  by  Federal  agencies.  Mr. 
Chairman, I am going to make this brief statement orally. In addi-
tion to the written testimony, I would like to have the two opinions 
and the circular be made part of the record. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  They  will  all  be  made  a  part  of  the  record.  We 
cannot  make  the  video  part  of  it,  but  the  statements  of  all  four  of 
you are part of the record. 
Ms. POLING. That is fine. 
As the members of this committee may know, GAO has been in-
terpreting  appropriations  law  and  issuing  opinions  since  Congress 
created  it  in  1921.  Since  1951,  when  the  prohibition  on  the  use  of 
appropriated  funds  for  publicity  or  propaganda  was  first  enacted, 
GAO  has  issued  over  25  opinions  interpreting  the  prohibition.  In 
the  past  year,  GAO  addressed,  for  the  first  time,  the  issue  of 
whether  prepackaged  news  stories  violate  the  prohibition  on  the 
use of appropriated funds for publicity or propaganda. 

We found that the two agencies we examined violated the prohi-
bition  by  producing  prepackaged  news  stories  that  did  not  identify 
to  the  target  audience,  that  is,  the  television-viewing  public,  that 
the agency was the source of the material. 

So what are prepackaged news stories? They are complete audio-
visual presentations that are designed to be indistinguishable from 
news  segments  broadcast  to  the  public  by  independent  television 
news  organizations.  Actors  or  voice-over  specialists  portray  report-
ers.  For  example,  a  Government  contractor  concludes  a  segment 
saying,  ‘‘from  Washington,  I’m  Karen  Ryan  reporting.’’  She  is  not 
a reporter. She is a paid Government contractor. 

There  is  also  usually  a  script  that  the  TV  news  anchors  can  use 
to  introduce  the  story  during  a  broadcast,  and  video  news  releases 
also contain slates and B-roll. Our opinion goes to the prepackaged 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

news  stories  because  we  did  not  find  problems  with  the  slates  and 
B-roll that we reviewed. 

Prepackaged  news  stories  permit  the  creators  to  maintain  some 
control  over  their  message.  They  are  also  cheaper  than  actually 
purchasing broadcast advertising. 

GAO addressed the use of prepackaged news stories in a decision 
regarding VNRs of the Department of Health and Human Services. 
The  prepackaged  news  stories  were  part  of  an  HHS  campaign  to 
inform Medicare recipients about the new prescription drug legisla-
tion.  We  also  looked  at  similar  prepackaged  news  stories  produced 
by the Office of National Drug Control Policy as part of its national 
youth anti-drug media campaign. 

Now,  GAO  has  long  recognized  that  agencies  have  a  right  and 
perhaps  even  a  duty  to  inform  the  public  about  their  policies,  pro-
grams, and activities. In both cases that we reviewed, GAO did not 
legally  object  to  the  contents  of  the  news  stories  themselves,  and 
we  affirmed  that  the  agencies  have  a  right  to  inform  the  public  of 
their programs and activities. 

However,  we  found  that  the  story  packages  were  targeted  to  the 
TV  viewers  and  clearly  designed  to  be  aired  exactly  as  the  agency 
had  prepared  them,  but  they  contained  no  identification  to  alert 
the TV viewers to the fact that the agency was actually the source 
of the purported news story. In both cases, no disclosure was made 
to the TV-viewing audience. As a result, the audience did not know 
that  they  were  watching  news  programs  about  the  Government 
that were, in fact, prepared by the Government. We concluded that 
production  and  distribution  of  prepackaged  news  stories  that  con-
cealed  the  agency’s  role  in  producing  the  story  was  covert  propa-
ganda  and,  therefore,  violated  the  prohibition  on  the  use  of  appro-
priated funds for publicity or propaganda. 

In preparing these two decisions, our literature search and infor-
mal  research  showed  that  the  use  of  VNRs  and  prepackaged  news 
stories was commonplace in the Government. The Comptroller Gen-
eral decided to issue a circular letter to heads of all cabinet depart-
ments  and  Federal  agencies  to  remind  them  of  their  duty  to  dis-
close the source of the materials that they disseminate to the pub-
lic. 

To sum up, first, the critical element of covert propaganda under 
the  appropriations  prohibition  is  concealment  of  the  agency’s  role 
in sponsoring the materials. 

Two,  agencies  have  a  right  to  disseminate  information  about 

their policies and activities, but not covertly. 

And  three,  agencies  may  use  prepackaged  news  stories  to  dis-
seminate  information  if  there  is  clear  disclosure  to  the  television- 
viewing audience that the material was prepared by the agency. 

I would like to close with a quote from the Comptroller General. 
He  said,  ‘‘Deceptive  video  news  releases  strike  a  blow  to  the  good 
Government  principles  of  transparency  and  accountability  that  are 
essential  for  a  healthy  democracy.  The  Government’s  credibility  is 
enhanced  by  openness  and  the  public  is  enriched  by  full  and  open 
debate.  These  actions  also  enhance  public  trust  in  the  Govern-
ment.’’ 

Mr. Chairman, that concludes my formal remarks and I would be 

glad to answer any questions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Poling follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF SUSAN A. POLING, MANAGING ASSOCIATE GENERAL 

COUNSEL, OFFICE OF GENERAL COUNSEL, GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE 
Chairman Stevens and members of the Committee: 
Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  be  here  today  to  discuss  the  legal  opinions  re-
cently  issued  by  the  Government  Accountability  Office  (GAO)  regarding  the  use  of 
prepackaged news stories by Federal agencies. In the past year, GAO has issued two 
legal  opinions  on  the  production  of  video  news  releases  (VNRs)  that  included  pre-
packaged  news  stories  by  both  the  Department  of  Health  and  Human  Services 
(HHS)  and  the  Office  of  National  Drug  Control  Policy  (ONDCP).  In  both  of  these 
instances,  we  concluded  that  the  agencies  violated  the  Federal  government-wide 
prohibition on the use of appropriated funds for purposes of publicity or propaganda 
not authorized by Congress. In addition, in February, the Comptroller General sent 
a circular letter to the heads of all Federal agencies to alert them to our recent opin-
ions and to remind them of the prohibition on publicity or propaganda. 
Background 

Since the 1990s, VNRs have become a popular public relations tool for private cor-
porations, nonprofit organizations, and government entities to disseminate informa-
tion,  in  part  because  they  provide  a  cheaper  alternative  than  more  traditional 
broadcast advertising and are welcomed by some local news stations in smaller mar-
kets with significant budget restraints. 
VNRs Contain Slates, B-Rolls, and Prepackaged News Stories 

While  the  use  of  VNRs  is  widespread  and  widely  known  by  those  in  the  media 
industry,  the  quality  and  content  of  materials  considered  to  constitute  a  VNR  can 
vary  greatly.  Generally,  a  VNR  package  may  contain  several  items,  including  a  se-
ries  of  video  clips,  known  as  B-roll  footage;  title  cards  containing  relevant  informa-
tion,  known  as  slates;  a  prepackaged  news  story,  sometimes  referred  to  as  a  story 
package;  and  other  promotional  materials.1 These  materials  are  produced  in  the 
same manner as television news organizations produce materials for their own news 
segments. By eliminating a news station’s production efforts and costs of producing 
an original news story, VNR creators can find stations willing to broadcast a favor-
able news segment on a desired topic. 

The  B-roll  footage  and  slates  are  intended  to  assist  news  stations  in  producing 
their  own  news  stories,  while  the  story  package  is  a  pre-assembled,  ready-to-air 
news  story  that  is  often  accompanied  by  a  suggested  lead-in  script  for  the  anchor. 
Even if a broadcaster does not use a story package or scripted materials in full, the 
production  of  a  professionally  complete  news  story  provides  a  framework  for  the 
message  conveyed  in  the  final  broadcast,  which  allows  the  producer,  in  this  case, 
the Federal agency, to assert some control over the message conveyed to the target 
audience—the viewer of the broadcast. 

The  popularity  of  VNRs  may  be  attributed  to  the  ease  with  which  the  materials 
may  be  distributed.  While  some  packages  are  distributed  directly  from  the  source 
to  television  stations,  satellite  and  electronic  news  services,  such  as  those  provided 
by  CNN  Newsource,  facilitate  distribution  to  a  number  of  news  markets  in  a  short 
period  of  time.  Broadcast  stations  subscribe  to  these  services,  which  provide  jour-
nalist  reports  and  stories  and  advertising,  in  addition  to  VNR  materials.  While  the 
news  services  label  VNRs  differently  than  independent  journalist  news  reports, 
there  apparently  is  no  industry  standard  as  to  the  labeling  of  VNRs.  In  fact,  some 
news  organizations  that  broadcast  the  HHS  VNR  indicated  that  they  misread  the 
label or they mistook the story package as an independent journalist news story on 
CNN Newsource. 
HHS VNRs Included Narration by Contractors Posing as Reporters 

GAO examined three VNR packages that HHS made available to local news orga-
nizations.  The  VNRs  consisted  of  three  videotapes  with  corresponding,  printed 
scripts;  two  of  the  videotapes  were  in  English,  and  one  was  in  Spanish.  The  B-roll 
footage on each of the English videotapes was exactly the same and contained foot-
age  of  President  Bush,  in  the  presence  of  Members  of  Congress  and  others,  signing 
the  Medicare  prescription  drug  legislation  into  law,  and  a  series  of  clips  of  seniors 
engaged  in  various  leisure  and  health-related  activities,  including  consulting  with 
a pharmacist and being screened for blood pressure. The English videotapes also in-

1 For  example,  the  Office  of  National  Drug  Control  Policy  (ONDCP)  video  news  releases  that 

we examined contained television advertisements and public service announcements. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

cluded  clips  of  former  HHS  Secretary  Tommy  Thompson  and  Leslie  Norwalk,  Dep-
uty  Administrator  of  the  Centers  for  Medicare  &  Medicaid  Services  (CMS),  making 
statements  regarding  changes  to  Medicare.  The  Spanish  videotape  includes  clips  of 
statements by Dr. Cristina Beato of CMS, instead of Thompson and Norwalk. 

The  two  English  VNRs  contained  different  story  packages,  each  narrated  by 
Karen  Ryan,  an  HHS  subcontractor,  who  was  not  affiliated  with  a  news  organiza-
tion.  The  first  story  package  focused  on  CMS’s  advertising  campaign  regarding  the 
prescription drug legislation. The suggested anchor lead-in stated that ‘‘the Federal 
Government  is  launching  a  new,  nationwide  campaign  to  educate  41  million  people 
with  Medicare  about  improvements  to  Medicare.’’  The  lead-in  ended  with  ‘‘Karen 
Ryan explains.’’ The video portion of the story package began with an excerpt of the 
television  advertisement  with  audio  stating,  ‘‘it’s  the  same  Medicare  you’ve  always 
counted  on  plus  more  benefits.’’  Karen  Ryan  then  explained,  ‘‘That’s  the  main  mes-
sage  Medicare’s  advertising  campaign  drives  home  about  the  law.’’  As  more  clips 
from  the  advertisement  appeared,  Karen  Ryan  continued  her  narration,  indicating 
that the campaign helps beneficiaries answer their questions about the new law, the 
Administration  is  emphasizing  that  seniors  can  keep  their  Medicare  the  same,  and 
the  campaign  is  part  of  a  larger  effort  to  educate  people  with  Medicare  about  the 
new  law.  The  story  package  ended  with  Karen  Ryan  stating:  ‘‘In  Washington,  I’m 
Karen Ryan reporting.’’ 

The  second  English  story  package  focused  on  various  provisions  of  the  new  pre-
scription  drug  benefit  and  did  not  mention  the  advertising  campaign.  The  anchor 
lead-in stated: ‘‘In December, President Bush signed into law the first ever prescrip-
tion  drug  benefit  for  people  with  Medicare.’’  The  anchor  lead-in  then  noted,  ‘‘There 
have  been  a  lot  of  questions  about’’  the  new  law  and  its  changes  to  Medicare  and 
‘‘Karen  Ryan  helps  sort  through  the  details.’’  The  video  portion  of  the  news  report 
started  with  footage  of  President  Bush  signing  the  legislation,  and  Karen  Ryan’s 
narration indicated that when it was ‘‘signed into law last month, millions of people 
who  are  covered  by  Medicare  began  asking  how  it  will  help  them.’’  Next,  the  seg-
ment  included  footage  of  Tommy  Thompson,  in  which  he  states  that  ‘‘it  will  be  the 
same Medicare system but with new benefits.’’ Karen Ryan continued her narration, 
stating 
‘‘most  of  the  attention  has  focused  on  the  new  prescription  drug 
benefit . . . all  people  with  Medicare  will  be  able  to  get  coverage  that  will  lower 
their  prescription  drug  spending . . . Medicare  will  offer  some  immediate  help 
through  a  discount  card.’’  She  also  told  viewers  that  new  preventive  benefits  will 
be available, low-income individuals may qualify for a $600 credit on available drug 
discount cards, and ‘‘Medicare officials emphasize that no one will be forced to sign 
up  for  any  of  the  new  benefits.’’  Karen  Ryan’s  narration  then  led  into  clips  of 
Thompson  and  Norwalk  explaining  other  beneficial  provisions  of  the  new  law.  The 
second  story  package  also  ended  with,  ‘‘In  Washington,  I’m  Karen  Ryan  reporting.’’ 
The  Spanish-language  materials  contained  the  same  three  items  as  the  English 
language VNRs—a B-roll, slates, and a story package. After the B-roll segments, the 
story package segment appeared. This segment was considerably longer than its two 
English  counterparts,  focused  on  prescription  drug  benefits,  and  was  narrated  by 
Alberto Garcia, who is also an HHS subcontractor, not a reporter. The anchor lead- 
in was similar to the second English story package, except the anchor indicates that 
Alberto  Garcia  ‘‘helps  sort  through  the  details.’’  The  video  segment  began  with  the 
footage of President Bush signing the prescription drug bill into law, as Alberto Gar-
cia narrated that after signing the law, millions of people who are covered by Medi-
care  began  asking  how  the  new  law  will  help  them.  The  remainder  of  the  story 
package contained footage of Dr. Beato and of seniors engaged in various activities. 
During the video clips of seniors, Alberto Garcia narrated that the prescription drug 
benefit  will  be  available  in  2006  and  that  drug  discount  cards  will  be  available  in 
June 2004 and that ‘‘[p]eople with Medicare may be able to choose from several dif-
ferent  drug  discount  cards,  offering  up  to  25  percent  savings  on  certain  medica-
tions.’’  Alberto  Garcia  concluded  his  report,  stating:  ‘‘In  Washington,  I’m  Alberto 
Garcia reporting.’’ 
ONDCP  Prepackaged  News  Stories  Were  Narrated  by  Contractors  Unaffiliated  with 

News Organizations 

For  the  ONDCP  legal  opinion,  GAO  examined  eight  VNRs,  seven  of  which  in-
cluded  prepackaged  news  stories,  in  addition  to  B-roll  footage  and  slates.  Each  of 
ONDCP’s  news  stories  included  narration  by  an  unseen  person,  identified  as  Mike 
Morris,  Karen  Ryan,  or  Jerry  Corsini.  The  narrator  explained  that  he  or  she  was 
‘‘reporting’’  on  various  ONDCP  activities  and  on  various  issues  related  to  the  use 
of  marijuana  by  teenagers.  Each  story  was  accompanied  by  proposed  ‘‘lead-in’’  and 
‘‘closing’’ remarks to be spoken by station news anchors. Many of the suggested an-
chor  remarks  included  a  phrase  like,  ‘‘Mike  Morris  has  the  story,’’  or  ‘‘Mike  Morris 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

has  more.’’  ONDCP  informed  us  that  the  narrators  were  hired  to  read  the  scripts 
for the prepackaged new stories, as prepared for and approved by ONDCP. Like the 
HHS VNR narrators, none of these narrators were affiliated with any news organi-
zation at the time the stories were produced or distributed. 

The various ONDCP story packages touched on the addictive nature of marijuana, 
the  risks  of  marijuana  use  to  teenagers,  an  open  letter  to  parents  that  was  spon-
sored by ONDCP regarding marijuana, the increased use of marijuana by teenagers 
during  the  summer,  the  dangers  of  driving  a  vehicle  while  under  the  influence  of 
marijuana, and the respiratory health risks of smoking marijuana. Most of the story 
packages featured statements by ONDCP Director John Walters and/or various drug 
experts.  The  suggested  anchor  closing  remarks  directed  viewers  to  an  anti-drug 
website and a toll-free telephone number. 
GAO’s Legal Opinions 

In May 2004, GAO first addressed the use of prepackaged news stories in an opin-
ion 2 issued  to  HHS  regarding  VNRs  it  had  prepared  as  part  of  a  campaign  to  in-
form  Medicare  recipients  about  the  new  prescription  drug  legislation.3 In  a  subse-
quent opinion issued in January 2005, we addressed the VNRs produced by ONDCP 
as part of its National Youth Anti-Drug Media Campaign.4 
Agency’s Right to Disseminate Information Does Not Include Covert Propaganda 

In  both  of  these  legal  opinions,  we  concluded  that  production  and  distribution  of 
prepackaged  news  stories  that  concealed  the  agency’s  role  in  producing  the  story 
violate  the  publicity  and  propaganda  prohibition.  While  GAO  has  long  recognized 
that  agencies  have  a  right  to  inform  the  public  about  their  activities  and  to  defend 
the  Administration’s  point  of  view  on  policy  matters,5 there  are  several  statutory 
limitations  on  an  agency’s  information  dissemination,  one  of  which  is  the  publicity 
or  propaganda  prohibition.  This  prohibition,  the  first  version  of  which  was  enacted 
in 1951, is usually contained in annual appropriations acts. It states that, ‘‘No part 
of  any  appropriation  contained  in  this  or  any  other  Act  shall  be  used  for  publicity 
or  propaganda  purposes  within  the  United  States  not  heretofore  authorized  by  the 
Congress.’’ 6 

In  applying  this  prohibition,  GAO  affords  agencies  a  great  deal  of  discretion  in 
their  informational  activities.  However,  GAO  has,  through  50  years  of  decisions, 
identified a number of specific activities that are barred by the publicity and propa-
ganda  prohibition.  One  of  the  main  targets  of  this  prohibition  is  agency-produced 
material that is covert as to source. 

Our  opinions  have  emphasized  that  the  critical  element  of  covert  propaganda  is 
concealment  of  the  government’s  role  in  producing  the  materials.7 GAO  has  con-
cluded  that  agencies  have  violated  the  law  when  they  undertook  activities  such  as 
distributing  suggested  editorials  to  newspapers  or  hiring  pundits  to  write  com-
mentaries  without  acknowledging  the  government’s  sponsorship.8 In  these  cases, 
even  though  the  newspapers  that  printed  the  opinion  pieces  may  have  been  aware 
of  their  source,  the  newspaper  readers  did  not  know  of  the  agency’s  role  in  pro-
ducing the materials. 
Unattributed  Prepackaged  News  Stories  Violate  Publicity  and  Propaganda 

Prohibition 

Similarly,  in  the  case  of  the  story  packages  produced  by  HHS  and  ONDCP,  the 
target  audience—the  viewing  public—was  unaware  that  the  material  was  produced 
by the government. The story packages were clearly designed to be aired exactly as 
the  agency  produced  them  and  were  intended  to  resemble  traditional  news  stories. 
They were narrated by government contract personnel who portrayed reporters and 
included suggested anchor lead-in scripts, announcing it as a news story by the pur-
ported reporter, which facilitated the unaltered use of the story package. 

Most  importantly,  the  story  packages  contained  no  statement  or  other  reference 
to  alert  television  viewers  to  the  fact  that  the  agency  was  the  source  of  the  pur-

2 In  addition  to  auditing  and  evaluating  programs  and  activities  of  the  Federal  Government 
and  investigating  matters  related  to  the  use  of  public  money,  GAO  is  also  responsible  for  set-
tling  all  accounts  of  the  Federal  Government.  31  U.S.C.  §§ 712,  717,  3526.  Pursuant  to  this  ac-
counts settlement authority, the Comptroller General issues legal decisions and opinions to Fed-
eral agencies and Members of Congress regarding the proper use of Federal funds. 

3 B–302710, May 19, 2004 (retained in Committee files). 
4 B–303495, Jan. 4, 2005 (retained in Committee files). 
5 See, e.g., B–304715, Apr. 27, 2005; B–302504, Mar. 10, 2004; B–184648, Dec. 3, 1975. 
6 See, e.g., Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2005, Pub. L. No. 108–447, div. H, title VI, § 624, 

118 Stat. 2809, 3278 (Dec. 8, 2004). 

7 B–229257, June 10, 1988. 
8 See, e.g., B–223098, Oct. 10, 1986; B–229069, Sept. 30, 1987. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

ported  news  story.  These  characteristics  may  lead  viewers  to  believe,  wrongly,  that 
the piece was an actual news story produced by the local television station and nar-
rated by a real reporter. Therefore, we concluded that the prepackaged news stories 
constituted covert propaganda and that HHS and ONDCP both violated the prohibi-
tion on the use of appropriated funds for publicity or propaganda.9 Furthermore, be-
cause  the  agencies  had  no  appropriation  available  for  covert  propaganda,  HHS  and 
ONDCP  also  violated  the  Antideficiency  Act,  which  prohibits  obligations  in  excess 
of available budget authority.10 

In  both  of  these  opinions,  we  also  noted:‘‘In  a  modest  but  meaningful  way,  the 
publicity  or  propaganda  restriction  helps  to  mark  the  boundary  between  an  agency 
making information available to the public and agencies creating news unbeknownst 
to  the  receiving  audience.’’  In  fact,  the  appropriations  prohibition  is  not  the  only 
marker that Congress has enacted to delineate the boundaries between the govern-
ment and the free American press.11 Statutory limits on the domestic dissemination 
of  news  reports  produced  by  the  Federal  Government  reflect  concern  that  allowing 
the  government  to  produce  domestic  news  broadcasts  would  infringe  upon  the  free-
dom  of  the  press  and  constitute,  or  at  least  give  the  appearance  of,  an  attempt  to 
control public opinion.12 

HHS  and  ONDCP  both  commissioned  and  distributed  prepackaged  news  stories 
and  introductory  scripts  about  their  activities  that  were  designed  to  be  indistin-
guishable from news stories produced by private news broadcasters. In neither case 
did  the  agency  include  any  statement  or  other  indication  in  its  news  stories  that 
disclosed  to  the  television  viewing  audience  (the  target  of  the  purported  news  sto-
ries)  that  the  agency  wrote  and  produced  those  news  stories.  In  other  words,  tele-
vision-viewing audiences did not know that stories they watched on television news 
programs about the government were, in fact, prepared by the government. We there-
fore  concluded  that  those  prepackaged  news  stories  violated  the  publicity  or  propa-
ganda prohibition. 
Circular Letter Advised All Agencies of Duty to Disclose Source of Materials 

In  addition  to  the  HHS  and  ONDCP  opinions,  the  Comptroller  General  issued  a 
circular letter to the heads of all cabinet departments and Federal agencies in Feb-
ruary of this year to alert agencies to our opinions on prepackaged news stories and 
to  remind  them  of  their  duty  to  disclose  the  source  of  materials  that  they  dissemi-
nate to the public.13 GAO decided that a government-wide circular would be appro-
priate  given  the  increasing  use  of  VNRs  by  the  Federal  Government.  In  fact,  our 
research showed that VNRs have been produced by a wide range of Federal depart-
ments  and  agencies,  from  the  Department  of  State  to  the  Census  Bureau  to  the 
Transportation Security Administration. 

Mr.  Chairman,  this  concludes  my  prepared  statement.  I  would  be  happy  to  re-
spond to any questions regarding our opinions that you or the Committee may have. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Do  you  want  to  show  your  video  now  or  later? 
Senator LAUTENBERG. I had hoped, Mr. Chairman, we could show 

it now as part of this testimony. 

The CHAIRMAN. It is about 3 minutes. Right? 
Ms. POLING. What you are going to see here is the complete video 

news release, but we can probably shorten it. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Let  us  not  shorten  it.  Let  us  show  it  all.  Let  us 

just see it. OK? 

Ms.  POLING.  OK.  First  it  contains  slates.  I  was  just  going  to  ex-

plain the parts of it. There are no words with this section. 

This is the video news release. What we are pointing out is that 
there  are  parts  of  video  news  releases.  This  is  slates.  This  is  just 

9 Although  both  HHS  and  ONDCP  pointed  to  specific  statutory  provisions  that  authorized 
them to disseminate information to the public, GAO concluded that such provisions did not au-
thorize  them  to  produce  unattributed  news  stories.  In  both  opinions,  GAO  also  concluded  that 
the  B-roll  footage  and  the  slates  did  not  violate  the  publicity  and  propaganda  prohibition  be-
cause  they  were  designed  to  be  viewed  and  utilized  solely  by  the  news  organizations,  and  the 
agencies had properly disclosed their role in the production of the materials to the stations. 

10 31 U.S.C. § 1341(a). 
11 See, e.g., 22 U.S.C. §§ 1461, 1461–1a (restricting the domestic dissemination of news reports 

originally created by the Government for broadcast abroad). 

12 B–118654–O.M., Apr. 17, 1979. 
13 B–304272, Feb. 17, 2005 (retained in Committee files). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

text  feed  that  can  be  used  by  the  programmers  when  they  put  to-
gether a news program. 

Then  you  will  see  some  B-roll,  which  is  various  kinds,  but  what 
you are going to see first, I think, are public officials making state-
ments. We do not have any problems with this. 

Then  you  are  going  to  see  a  public  service  announcement  which 
does  identify  exactly  that  this  is  a  product  of  the  Department  of 
HHS. 

This is the ad. 
[Video shown.] 
Ms. POLING. That was the ad. 
This is the prepackaged news story. The rest is B-roll. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Can we hear it or not? 
Ms. POLING. The text is irrelevant. It is really the visual. 
The  B-roll  consists  of  pieces  that  the  television  news  studio  can 

use to put together its own story. 

That is the end. 
The CHAIRMAN. What is the disclaimer? 
Ms. POLING. I did not hear you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Ms. Cochran. 

STATEMENT OF BARBARA COCHRAN, PRESIDENT, 

RADIO-TELEVISION NEWS DIRECTORS ASSOCIATION 

Ms.  COCHRAN.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  members  of  the  Com-
mittee.  I  am  Barbara  Cochran,  the  President  of  the  Radio-Tele-
vision News Directors Association. Thank you for inviting me to ap-
pear  today  on  behalf  of  the  electronic  journalists,  educators,  stu-
dents,  and  executives  who  comprise  RTNDA,  the  world’s  largest 
professional  organization  devoted  exclusively  to  electronic  jour-
nalism. 

As  you  know,  our  members  are  on  the  front  lines  in  managing 
the  news  operations  of  radio,  television,  cable,  and  other  news  dis-
tribution  organizations.  We  are  committed  to  providing  accurate 
and  credible  news  stories.  That  commitment  includes  appropriate 
identification  of  materials  used  in  our  stories.  Credibility  is  our 
stock in trade. If our viewers and listeners cannot trust our stories, 
they will tune us out, literally. 

The appropriate use of third party video and video news releases 
is  not  a  new  subject  for  our  members.  We  have  sought  to  address 
questions  of  when  and  how  to  use  these  materials  for  more  than 
15 years. Our consistent policy adopted in 1989 has been that clear 
and  complete  disclosure  of  outside  materials  must  occur,  and  this 
policy is incorporated in our code of ethics. 

With  the  recent  and  public  reports  concerning  governmentally 
produced  and  funded  videos,  we  revisited  and  expanded  upon  the 
guidelines. A copy of these guidelines is attached to my written tes-
timony.  News  directors  have  reviewed  the  guidelines  with  their 
staffs  and  they  have  reviewed  their  procedures  to  ensure  material 
is properly identified. 

Some of these recent reports may leave the mistaken impression 
that  unidentified  VNRs  are  widely  used.  Based  on  my  conversa-
tions with news directors, little outside material is used in the doz-
ens  of  stories  and  many  hours  of  news  programming  that  stations 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

produce  each  and  everyday.  When  third  party  material  is  used,  it 
is  most  often  excerpted  or  used  as  background  footage,  the  kind  of 
B-roll  that  we  just  saw,  and  it  is  attributed.  Rarely  are  entire  re-
leases used and even more rarely is the source not identified. 

Even  so,  some  mistakes  were  made.  In  part,  these  miscues  can 
be traced to technological changes that have made the distribution 
of  audio  and  video  materials  more  complicated  and  led  to  difficul-
ties  in  ascertaining  the  points  of  origin.  In  many  of  the  reported 
cases  of  unlabeled  material,  the  station  or  the  news  director  has 
told me that all future material will be identified. 

Whatever the causes or reasons, I can report that steps are being 
taken  to  reemphasize  and  endorse  full  disclosure.  News  organiza-
tions  and  producers  have  changed  and  are  changing  the  distribu-
tion procedures to make sure that material is clearly labeled when 
it is sent out. 

In the newsroom, news directors and journalists also have taken 
steps  to  ensure  adherence  to  the  RTNDA  guidelines.  And  in  addi-
tion,  we  will  work  with  the  FCC  as  it  seeks  comments  on  appro-
priate ways to improve source identification and disclosure. 

RTNDA members are committed to the appropriate identification 
of third party materials, and we believe that the current guidelines 
and the reinvigorated practices of our members will adequately and 
properly  support  this  commitment  and  ensure  that  the  public  is 
fully informed. Accordingly, we do not believe that Government ac-
tion is needed, at least not at this time. 

Determining  the  content  of  a  newscast,  including  when  and  how 
to  identify  sources,  is  at  the  very  heart  of  our  responsibilities  as 
electronic journalists, and these decisions must remain far removed 
from  Government  involvement  or  supervision.  The  Government 
must  be  cautious  in  considering  any  action  through  legislation  or 
regulation  that  could  interfere  with  journalist  judgment  or  other-
wise influence or dictate news decisions or content. Any such action 
must  be  a  last  resort,  not  an  initial  reaction.  RTNDA  urges  you, 
therefore, not to respond to the mistakes of a few by imposing rules 
that could affect the selection and presentation of newsworthy ma-
terial. We have every incentive today to protect the integrity of our 
news  broadcasts  by  fully  informing  our  viewers.  The  policy  guid-
ance  and  procedures  are  in  place  to  address  the  recent  missteps 
and  to  fulfill  our  responsibilities.  Government  intervention,  while 
well intended, is unnecessary and could be harmful. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Cochran follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF BARBARA COCHRAN, PRESIDENT, 

RADIO-TELEVISION NEWS DIRECTORS ASSOCIATION 

Mr. Chairman and members of the Committee, I am Barbara Cochran, President 
of the Radio-Television News Directors Association (RTNDA). Thank you for inviting 
me  to  appear  before  you  today  to  discuss  S.  967,  the  Truth  in  Broadcasting  bill  in-
troduced by Senator Lautenberg and cosponsored by other Senators, including mem-
bers of this committee, Senators Kerry, Boxer and Dorgan. 

RTNDA  is  the  world’s  largest  professional  organization  devoted  exclusively  to 
electronic  journalism.  RTNDA  represents  local  and  network  news  executives,  edu-
cators, students and others in the radio, television and cable news business in over 
thirty  countries.  I  have  worked  as  a  journalist  in  Washington  for  nearly  30  years 
and have held management positions in print, radio and television. I was managing 
editor of the Washington Star, Vice President for news at National Public Radio, ex-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

ecutive  producer  of  ‘‘Meet  the  Press’’  at  NBC  News,  and  vice  president  and  Wash-
ington bureau chief at CBS News. I became president of RTNDA in 1997. 

As  you  well  know,  the  members  of  RTNDA  are  on  the  front  lines  in  managing 
the news operations of radio, television and other electronic news distribution orga-
nizations.  News  directors  are  responsible  for  determining  what  stories  will  be  cov-
ered  as  well  as  when  and  how  these  stories  will  be  presented.  News  organizations 
often receive news topic suggestions and materials from third parties. These inputs 
are  not  a  significant  source  of  news  for  most  operations,  and  they  do  not  replace 
the  important  and  substantial  news-gathering  activities  of  our  members’  organiza-
tions.  In  the  case  of  audio  clips  and  video  footage,  these  inputs  can,  however,  pro-
vide useful material that the news organization could not have obtained on its own. 
For  example,  a  hospital  may  provide  footage  of  its  operating  room  or  NASA  may 
provide  a  graphic  depiction  of  a  space  mission.  When  third  party  audio  or  video  is 
submitted  to  a  news  operation,  the  news  director  or  a  news  staff  member  who  has 
been  assigned  that  responsibility  must  determine  the  newsworthiness  of  the  mate-
rial, and he or she must judge whether and how to use this material. 

On behalf of my membership, I want to express our appreciation to the Chairman 
for scheduling this hearing to provide an opportunity to discuss the appropriate role 
of the government in the treatment of VNRs. We also appreciate the initiative taken 
by  Senator  Lautenberg  and  the  other  sponsors  of  S.  967  to  ensure  that  VNRs  dis-
tributed  to  broadcasters  and  other  programming  distributors  contain  information 
concerning  their  source.  As  Commissioner  Adelstein  recently  said,  ‘‘it  is  up  to  Con-
gress  if  it  chooses  to  further  strengthen  the  responsibility  of  government  agencies 
to disclose more fully that material is government-produced.’’ 

As  news  directors,  we  appreciate  the  policy  rationale  for  the  disclosure  require-
ment imposed on government agencies that prepare and release ‘‘prepackaged news 
stories,’’  as  contemplated  by  S.  967  and  contained  in  Senator  Byrd’s  amendment  to 
the recently passed supplemental appropriations legislation. 

The  issue  of  how  to  use  material  from  video  and  audio  news  releases  is  one 
RTNDA has grappled with for more than 15 years. As electronic journalists, RTNDA 
members are committed to providing the public with accurate and credible news sto-
ries.  In  1989,  RTNDA’s  Board  of  Directors,  whose  members  are  news  executives 
from across the country, adopted a policy that calls for clear and complete disclosure 
of the origin of any outside material that is used in a news story or news program. 
This policy was incorporated into the RTNDA Code of Ethics and Professional Con-
duct  when  it  was  revised  in  2000.  The  statement  is  unambiguous.  The  Code  says 
that professional electronic journalists should ‘‘clearly disclose the origin of informa-
tion and label all materials provided by outsiders.’’ 

Last  year,  when  it  was  first  disclosed  that  a  few  stations  had  used  a  video  news 
release produced by a Federal agency without disclosing the origin, possibly because 
the  origin  was  not  clear,  the  RTNDA  Ethics  Committee  decided  to  expand  its  guid-
ance  on  the  use  of  outside  audio  and  video  material.  Over  the  past  12  months,  the 
Committee  developed  guidelines  for  newsrooms  as  they  consider  whether  to  incor-
porate  this  material  into  their  own  stories  or  programs.  The  guidelines  were  re-
leased  at  our  annual  convention  in  April.  I  have  attached  a  copy  of  the  guidelines 
to my statement and ask that it be included in the hearing record. (ATTACHMENT) 
The  main  principle  is  unchanged:  material  from  outside  sources  must  be  clearly 
identified to the audience. 

The  guidelines  are  intended  to  help  with  the  editorial  decision-making  about 

whether the material should be used in the first place. 

Recent  events  have  highlighted  the  importance  these  guidelines.  In  March,  the 
New  York  Times  reported  that  the  Federal  Government  was  sending  an  unprece-
dented number of video news releases to local stations and they found evidence that 
some  stations  were  using  the  releases  without  altering  them  or  identifying  them. 
Unfortunately,  as  the  story  was  spread  through  other  news  media,  the  impression 
grew  that  the  use  of  unidentified  audio  and  video  from  government  agencies  was 
a  rampant  practice.  That  is  not  the  case.  Based  on  conversations  with  news  direc-
tors  over  the  past  two  months,  I  believe  stations  use  very  little  outside  material 
among the dozens of stories and hours of news programming they produce each day. 
Of  the  material  they  receive,  far  more  comes  from  corporate  sources  than  govern-
ment  agencies.  Furthermore,  the  material  is  far  more  likely  to  be  used  as  back-
ground  footage  or  excerpted  in  stories  that  the  news  rooms  produce  themselves. 
Very rarely are releases used in their entirety. Technological changes have made the 
distribution  of  audio  and  video  material  more  complicated  and  sometimes  made  it 
more  difficult  to  ascertain  the  point  of  origin.  Providers  have  taken  steps  to  make 
sure that, even in newer, digital formats, this material is clearly labeled. 

Nonetheless, the reports that originated with the New York Times challenged the 
credibility  of  local  news.  As  a  consequence,  news  directors  have  met  with  their 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

staffs,  reiterated  their  policies  and  made  sure  everyone  in  the  newsroom  under-
stands  that  if  such  material  is  used  it  must  be  identified.  We  believe  RTNDA’s 
guidelines will be helpful in facilitating those newsroom discussions. 

Because  electronic  journalists  operate  as  trustees  of  the  public,  underlying  our 
VNR  guidelines  is  the  basic  tenet  that  the  public  must  be  properly  informed.  News 
operations are primarily concerned with the collection and accurate reporting of rel-
evant  news  stories  to  their  listeners  and  viewers.  In  the  vast  majority  of  cases  and 
operations, news is collected directly by the news staff. Even when third party video 
or  audio  is  received,  it  generally  will  not  be  used  by  a  local  news  organization  if 
similar  material  can  be  obtained  directly  by  the  station  or  through  a  network  feed. 
Our  guidelines  reflect  and  reinforce  this  practice.  When  a  judgment  is  made  that 
third party video is relevant to a news story and cannot be obtained through a news 
source, our guidelines call for the clear disclosure of the origin of the material—and 
this disclosure applies to all sources of third party materials, including private par-
ties,  corporations  and  all  levels  of  government.  The  guidelines  cover  a  broad  range 
of  situations  and  VNR  materials.  They  seek  to  protect  the  editorial  integrity  of  the 
audio  and  video  aired,  to  avoid  commercialization  of  news  stories,  and  to  otherwise 
guard against third party influence of news content. 

We believe that these guidelines help to ensure that the public receives the high-
est  quality  and  most  accurate  information  and  is  fully  informed  as  to  the  source  of 
third  party  material.  Our  members  have  renewed  their  efforts  to  honor  their  com-
mitments  to  these  guidelines  and  to  their  responsibilities  as  electronic  journalists. 
Significant market forces compel them to do so—credibility with their listeners and 
viewers is their stock in trade. 

As the bill reflects, sections 317 and 507 of the Communications Act of 1934 con-
fer  disclosure  authority  and  responsibilities  on  the  Federal  Communications  Com-
mission  with  regard  to  sponsorship  identification  by  broadcasters,  cable  operators, 
producers  and  others  subject  to  its  rules.  The  FCC  recently  issued  a  ‘‘reminder’’  to 
these entities of their obligations to comply with the FCC’s rules. The FCC’s release 
stated  that  its  ‘‘rules  are  grounded  in  the  principle  that  listeners  and  viewers  are 
entitled  to  know  who  seeks  to  persuade  them.’’  RTNDA  supports  this  public  right 
to  know  and  our  guidelines  are  designed  to  achieve  this  goal  of  clearly  disclosing 
‘‘the  nature,  source  and  sponsorship’’  of  news  material  viewed  by  the  public.  The 
FCC  also  is  seeking  comment  on  appropriate  ways  to  improve  the  disclosures  and 
the  situations  covered  thereby.  RTNDA  looks  forward  to  the  opportunity  to  submit 
comments and to work with the FCC and others to ensure the public receives clear 
and  accurate  disclosure—and  most  importantly—that  the  public  has  clear  and  un-
fettered access to relevant information. 

The  determination  of  what  to  include  in  any  particular  newscast  constitutes  the 
very  core  journalistic  function  of  a  broadcaster,  and  is  a  matter  far  removed  from 
government supervision. The Government must be cautious, therefore, in taking any 
action  that  would  interfere  with  the  editorial  judgments  of  electronic  journalists  or 
otherwise dictate news decisions or content. RTNDA urges you, therefore, not to re-
spond  to  the  mistakes  of  a  few  by  imposing  rules  that  could  very  well  restrict  the 
ability  of  professional  journalists  to  select  and  present  newsworthy  material  to  the 
public.  Electronic  journalists  have  every  incentive  to  protect  the  editorial  integrity 
of the audio and video they air without government intervention. 

In closing, I believe we share common goals—a free press and an informed public. 
I look forward to working with you to develop the best ways to achieve and protect 
these goals. 

ATTACHMENT 

RTNDA Guidelines for Use of Non-editorial Video and Audio (April 2005) 

Television and radio stations should strive to protect the editorial integrity of the 
video  and  audio  they  air.  This  integrity,  at  times,  might  come  into  question  when 
stations  air  video  and  audio  provided  to  newsrooms  by  companies,  organizations  or 
governmental  agencies  with  political  or  financial  interests  in  publicizing  the  mate-
rial.  News  staffs  should  find  answers  to  the  following  questions  when  making  deci-
sions to broadcast video or audio produced and/or supplied by non-editorial sources. 
RTNDA’s  Code  of  Ethics  and  Professional  Conduct  states  that  professional  elec-
tronic journalists should ‘‘clearly disclose the origin of information and label all ma-
terial provided by outsiders.’’ The following guidelines are offered to meet this goal. 
• News  managers  and  producers  should  determine  if  the  station  is  able  to  shoot 
this  video  or  capture  this  audio  itself,  or  get  it  through  regular  editorial  chan-
nels, such as its network feed service. If this video/audio is available in no other 
way  but  through  corporate  release  (as  in  the  case  of  proprietary  assembly  line 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

video), then managers should decide what value using the video/audio brings to 
the  newscast,  and  if  that  value  outweighs  the  possible  appearance  of  ‘‘product 
placement’’ or commercial interests. 
• News  managers  and  producers  should  clearly  disclose  the  origin  of  information 
and  label  all  material  provided  by  corporate  or  other  non-editorial  sources.  For 
example,  graphics  could  denote  ‘‘Mercy  Hospital  video’’  and  the  reporter  or  an-
chor script could also acknowledge it by stating, ‘‘This operating room video was 
provided by Mercy Hospital.’’ 
• News  managers  and  producers  should  determine  if  interviews  provided  with 
video/audio releases follow the same standards regarding conflicts of interest as 
used  in  the  newsroom.  For  instance,  some  releases  might  contain  interviews 
where  subjects  and  interviewers  are  employed  by  the  same  organization.  Con-
sider whether tough questions were asked and if the subject was properly ques-
tioned. 
• Before  re-voicing  and  airing  stories  released  with  all  their  elements  and  in-
tended  for  that  purpose,  managers  and  producers  should  ask  questions  regard-
ing whether the editorial process behind the story is in concert with those used 
in  the  newsroom.  Some  questions  to  ask  include  whether  more  than  one  side 
is included, if there is a financial agenda to releasing the story, and if the view-
ers and/or listeners would believe this is work done locally by your team. 
• Producers  should  question  the  source  of  network  feed  video  that  appears  to 
have come from sources other than the network’s news operation. Network feed 
producers should supply information revealing the source of such material. 
• News  managers  and  producers  should  consider  how  video/audio  released  from 
groups  without  a  profit  or  political  agenda,  such  as  nonprofit,  charitable  and 
educational  institutions,  will  be  used  in  newscasts,  if  at  all.  Can  this  material 
add  valuable  insight  to  local  stories?  Has  it  been  issued  to  be  aired  locally  and 
credited  to  the  issuing  organizations.  Will  viewers  find  it  to  be  useful  informa-
tion? 
Developed by the RTNDA Ethics Committee 

The CHAIRMAN. Mr. Simon. 

STATEMENT OF DOUGLAS SIMON, PRESIDENT/CEO, 

D S SIMON PRODUCTIONS, INC. 

Mr. SIMON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman, Senator DeMint, Senator 

Lautenberg. It is an honor for me to be here. 

I would like to disclose that my company has produced public re-
lations  video  for  both  the  current  Bush  Administration  and  the 
Clinton  Administration.  Just  like  Government  dissemination  of 
print  press  releases,  Government  video  news  releases  and  B-roll 
packages  are  a  necessary  tool  to  keep  the  public  informed,  which-
ever  political  party  is  in  power.  But  this  legitimate  tool  must  not 
be abused and disclosure is critical. 

The  first  video  news  releases,  or  VNRs,  were  created  in  the  late 
1940s, and the first Federal agency produced VNR that I remember 
personally  watching  was  during  the  Nixon  Administration.  When 
Neil  Armstrong  walked  on  the  moon,  no  network  had  a  camera 
crew  at  the  Sea  of  Tranquility.  NASA  provided  the  footage  and  no 
one complained. 

I have been invited by this committee to examine this bill based 
upon  existing  law  and  existing  practices  in  the  news  industry.  Re-
gardless of VNR vendor practice, the overwhelming majority of pro-
ducers  and  reporters  at  TV  stations  know  the  origin  of  VNR  video 
before  deciding  to  air  it,  and  there  is  a  simple  reason  for  this.  Re-
porters  will  not  air  the  video  if  they  do  not  know  the  source.  They 
insist on disclosure. 

Now,  while  the  broadcast  decisionmakers  know  the  source,  their 
station  managers  may  not.  The  analogy  I  make  is  that  the  pub-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

lisher  of  a  newspaper  probably  does  not  know  what  is  on  page  5 
of  the  Metro  Section.  That  is  why,  when  asked  about  a  controver-
sial  Government  piece  airing  on  their  station,  the  news  directors 
honestly  say,  you  know,  I  do  not  know.  I  had  no  idea.  Well,  they 
know now and I think that is a very positive development. 

There  have  been  loopholes  that  have  allowed  some  Government 
video  to  reach  journalists  via  network  newsfeed  services  with  the 
broadcasters possibly confused about its origin. These loopholes are 
being closed. Newsfeeds are now passing that information along to 
their affiliates. 

Now,  as  a  VNR  producer  and  distributor,  you  might  expect  that 
I am against any regulation that affects our industry practice. I am 
not.  While  many  in  the  PR  industry  may  disagree,  I  believe  when 
Government is involved, and even in the private sector, not only do 
the  journalistic  gatekeepers  need  to  know  the  original  funding 
source  of  VNR  material,  the  public  has  a  right  to  know  as  well. 
That  being  said,  increased  Government  control  over  news  broad-
casts is not a hallmark of democracy. 

The Truth in Broadcasting bill will decrease, not increase, the in-
formation  available  to  the  public.  It  will  limit,  not  expand,  the 
transparency  of  Government  activities.  The  bill  calls  for  the  FCC 
to  create  the  design,  presentation,  and  language  of  a  disclaimer 
that  news  stations  would  be  required  to  air  throughout  the  entire 
segment. Rather than deciding whether the story or a portion of it 
should  air,  based  on  news  standards,  stations  will  be  factoring  in 
whether they are comfortable changing the look of their broadcast. 
Depending  on  the  politics  of  the  Administration  in  power  and  in 
their  viewing  area,  broadcasters  may  feel  pressure  if  they  run  or 
do not run Government video. 

This  bill  could  result  in  the  Government  altering  the  format  of 
the video it produces to avoid disclosure requirements. Worse, Gov-
ernment  may  turn  to  unregulated  third  parties  or  pop-up  think 
tanks to become the source of video and escape restrictions. 

If legislation is needed, rather than regulate and possibly threat-
en  broadcasters,  I  would  encourage  that  you  draft  the  Trans-
parency  in  Government  Use  of  PR  Video  Act.  Obviously,  I  am  not 
a  legislator  with  that  title.  This  act  would  require  all  Government 
video  distributed  to  news  stations,  whether  VNR,  B-roll,  or  other-
wise,  be  posted  on  a  Government  website  where  the  public  could 
access it, not just the small percentage of viewers who may end up 
seeing  it  on  their  local  news.  The  FCC  Commissioner  at  today’s 
hearing  already  is  on  record  saying  it  would  not  impose  financial 
burdens on Government. 

Other things to consider. E-mail and fax pitches on behalf of the 
video news releases should disclose that the U.S. Government pro-
duced the package. 

The  videotape  could  include  a  graphic  identifying  the  Govern-
ment  as  the  source  of  the  video  at  the  front  of  the  tape,  as  is  cur-
rent  industry  standard,  the  VNR  without  graphics,  and  a  second 
version of the video on the tape with the disclaimer burned in over 
the  entire  video.  This  will  avoid  confusion  and  give  broadcasters 
the  option  of  how  its  disclaimer  should  look  without  the  threat  of 
Government sanction. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

This suggested approach will dramatically increase transparency 
in  Government,  allow  the  dissemination  of  more  accurate  informa-
tion to millions more people, and preserve our freedom of the press. 
Voice-overs  in  VNRs  have  been  an  industry  convention  for  more 
than  40  years.  The  focus  on  fake  reporters,  in  terms  of  the  public 
good, misses the core issue. The public has the same right to know 
what our Government does when a voice-over is recorded on a VNR 
as when it is not. 

And VNRs are not fake news because they are not news. A video 
news release is a communications tool by an interested party to get 
its  message  on  television.  When  that  interested  party  is  the  Gov-
ernment, the public has the right to know, and this is true whether 
it is factual information or what some would call propaganda. 

I  believe  these  goals  can  be  achieved  without  limiting  the  rights 

of broadcasters. Thank you very much. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Simon follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DOUGLAS SIMON, PRESIDENT/CEO, 

D S SIMON PRODUCTIONS, INC. 

Thank  you.  I’d  like  to  start  by  disclosing  that  my  company,  D  S  Simon  Produc-
tions,  has  produced  video  news  releases  or  VNRs  for  Federal  agencies  during  both 
the Clinton and current Bush Administrations. 

It  is  said  that  the  first  VNRs  were  created  in  the  late  1940s.  The  first  Federal 
Agency  produced  VNR  that  I  remember  personally  watching  was  during  the  Nixon 
Administration.  When  Neil  Armstrong  walked  on  the  moon  no  network  had  a  cam-
era crew at the Sea of Tranquility. NASA provided the footage. No one complained. 
I  have  been  invited  by  this  committee  to  examine  this  bill  based  upon  existing 

law and existing practices in the news industry. 

Regardless  of  VNR  vendor  practice,  the  overwhelming  majority  of  producers  and 
reporters  at  TV  stations  know  the  origin  of  VNR  video  before  deciding  to  air  it. 
There’s a simple reason for this. Stations won’t air the video if they don’t know the 
source. They insist on disclosure. 

While the broadcast decision makers know the source, their station managers may 
not.  The  analogy  I  make  is  that  the  publisher  of  a  newspaper  may  not  know  what 
is  being  written  on  page  five  of  the  metro  section.  That  is  why  when  asked  about 
a  controversial  government  video  airing  on  their  news  programs,  News  Directors 
honestly  answered  they  didn’t  know.  They  know  now  and  I  view  this  as  a  positive 
development. 

There  have  been  loopholes  that  have  allowed  some  government  video  to  reach 
journalists  via  network  newsfeed  services  with  the  broadcasters  possibly  confused 
about  its  origin.  These  loopholes  are  being  closed.  Changes  in  broadcast  practices 
now require this funding information to be passed on to the affiliates. 

As a VNR producer and distributor, you might expect that I am against any regu-
lation that effects our industry practice. I’m not. While many in the PR Video Indus-
try disagree, I believe, when government is involved, and even in the private sector, 
not  only  do  the  journalistic  gatekeepers  need  to  know  the  original  funding  source 
of  VNR  material  but  the  public  has  the  right  to  know.  That  being  said,  increased 
government control over news broadcasts is not a hallmark of democracy. 

I  am  concerned  the  ‘‘Truth  In  Broadcasting’’  bill  will  decrease,  not  increase  the 
information available to the public. It will limit, not expand the transparency of gov-
ernment activities. The bill calls for the FCC to create the design, presentation and 
language of a disclaimer that news stations would be required to air throughout the 
entire  segment.  Rather  than  deciding  whether  the  story,  or  a  portion  of  it,  should 
air  based  on  news  standards,  stations  will  be  factoring  in  whether  they  are  com-
fortable  changing  the  look  of  their  broadcast.  Depending  on  the  politics  of  the  Ad-
ministration  in  power,  and  in  their  viewing  area,  broadcasters  may  feel  pressure  if 
they run or don’t run government video. 

This  bill  could  result  in  the  Government  altering  the  format  of  the  video  it  pro-
duces to avoid disclosure requirements. Worse, government may turn to unregulated 
third  parties  or  pop-up  think  tanks  to  become  the  source  of  the  video  and  escape 
restrictions.  The  most  serious  risk  is  increasing  government  control  over  broadcast 
news limiting freedom of speech—especially when coupled with the recent FCC No-
tice of April 13th which held stations could be subject to fine when failing to disclose 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

the source of ‘‘matter furnished to them’’ which could be applied to any information 
broadcasters receive. 

If  legislation  is  needed,  rather  than  regulate  and  threaten  broadcasters  I  would 
encourage  that  you  draft  the  ‘‘Transparency  in  Government  use  of  PR  Video  Act.’’ 
This act would require: 

All  government  video  disseminated  to  news  stations  whether  they  include  pre- 
packaged  news  stories  or  not  be  posted  on  a  government  website  where  the  public 
could access it. 

All e-mail and fax pitches on behalf of placing the video would be required to dis-

close that the package is produced by the U.S. Government. 

The  video  tape  would  include  a  graphic  identifying  the  government  as  the  source 
of the video at the front of the tape, the VNR without graphics and a second version 
of  the  video  on  the  tape  with  the  disclaimer  burned  in  over  the  entire  video.  This 
will  avoid  confusion  and  give  broadcasters  the  option  of  how  its  disclaimer  should 
look without the threat of government sanction. 

This  bill  will  dramatically  increase  transparency  in  government,  allow  the  dis-
semination  of  more  accurate  information  to  millions  more  people  and  preserve  our 
freedom of the press. 

Voice-overs  in  VNRs  have  been  an  industry  convention  for  more  than  40  years. 
The focus on ‘‘fake reporters’’ in terms of the public good misses the core issue. The 
public  has  the  same  right  to  know  what  our  government  does,  when  a  voice-over 
is recorded on a VNR and when it is not. 

Much  also  has  been  made  of  ‘‘fake  news’’  which  conveys  a  powerful  but  false 
image  when  applied  to  VNRs.  The  truth  is  that  what  we  provide  for  government 
clients is not news, fake or otherwise. It is paid advocacy. I hope we can agree that 
third-party  video  of  all  kinds  is  advocacy  whether  you  believe  it  is  factual  informa-
tion  or  propaganda.  I  call  on  you  to  seriously  consider  these  recommendations  and 
focus  your  attention  on  government  behavior  as  opposed  to  setting  limits  on  broad-
casters. Thank you. 
Supplemental Information 
Who I am Speaking on Behalf of 

It is an honor for me to be here today. While I have long been active in promoting 
ethical practices within public relations and currently serve as Vice President of the 
Public  Relations  Society  of  America’s  New  York  Chapter,  I  am  here  in  my  capacity 
as President & CEO of D S Simon Productions, a company that I founded 19 years 
ago on July 4, 1986. 
VNR Industry Practices 

The  industry  custom  for  how  VNRs  are  produced  has  been  established  since  the 
late  1960s.  It  includes  an  edited  package  with  a  voice-over  that  a  station  could  air 
in  part  or  in  whole  or  simply  use  as  a  reference  when  they  create  a  story  using 
third-party video. We see approximately five percent of the VNRs we distribute air-
ing in their entirety and an even smaller number using the actual voice-over we re-
corded.  The  goal  of  a  VNR  project  is  to  receive  the  widest  possible  airings  of  the 
key messages contained within. Given the small percentage of airings where an en-
tire  video  is  used,  a  well-crafted  VNR  offers  stations  maximum  flexibility  in  using 
the  story  as  they  see  fit.  In  some  cases,  a  station  will  use  the  video  to  support  a 
story  angle  that  is  either  unrelated  to  or  even  in  opposition  to  the  intended  mes-
saging in the Video News Release. This is an accepted risk in our industry and com-
bined  with  the  station  option  not  to  use  the  video,  is  one  of  the  best  safeguards  at 
avoiding overly commercial or overly biased information being disseminated. 

The  VNR  tape  typically  includes  additional  sound  bites  and  footage  as  well  as 
background information, as a graphic and contact information for a journalist to fact 
check. Depending on the story and budget, some projects will not include a scripted 
package  but  will  simply  include  footage,  sound  bites  and  background  information. 
This is commonly called a ‘‘B-Roll’’ package. 

Once the video is produced, it is delivered to news outlets via satellite, direct mail 
or  some  of  the  newer  digital  distribution  systems.  The  third  aspect  of  the  process 
is notifying the media that the story is available. This is done by, e-mail, fax, phone 
pitches and wire services. The fourth part of the process is monitoring of usage. This 
is  done  primarily  through  an  electronic  encoding  signal  (much  like  closed  cap-
tioning)  that  is  invisible  to  the  viewer  at  home  but  allows  Nielsen  Media  Research 
to  report  back  to  us  which  stations  have  aired  VNR  video  and  when.  Secondary 
monitoring services are also used. 

I can state emphatically that almost 100 percent of the broadcast decision makers 
we  deal  with  know  the  original  funding  source  of  the  video  we  provide  them.  We 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

include  notification  about  the  original  funding  source  in  our  e-mail  and  fax  pitches 
in addition to labeling on the video itself. 
Broadcast Industry Practice 

The Radio-Television News Directors Association (RTNDA) has issued new guide-
lines.  CNN  Newsource,  CBS  Newspath  and  Fox  NewsEdge  also  sell  time  to  VNR 
distributors on their newsfeed services. CBS has always labeled this video as a cor-
porate  feed  and  identifies  the  funding  sponsor  to  its  affiliates.  CNN  now  has  VNR 
video  and  its  own  video  on  a  separate  interface  so  a  station  cannot  pull  a  VNR 
thinking  it  was  CNN  content.  This  change  was  made  after  the  infamous  ‘‘Karen 
Ryan video’’ for the Department of Health and Human Services. The Fox NewsEdge 
affiliate  feed  now  includes  a  ‘‘Courtesy  of ’’  banner  on  all  third-party  video  sent  out 
to its affiliates. 

In a survey of 132 broadcast producers and reporters D S Simon Productions com-
pleted  in  April  of  this  year  before  the  FCC  Notice  was  issued,  they  told  us  that  if 
they  receive  even  a  pitch  that  does  not  reveal  the  sponsor  almost  80  percent  never 
use the story that follows. 
The Proportion of Unlabeled Government Video to Broadcast News Content 

How  much  government  produced  VNR  content  is  the  public  actually  seeing  that 
is  controversial  or  unlabeled?  From  conversations  I’ve  had  with  representatives  of 
monitoring  services  no  more  than  10  percent  of  news  is  VNR  footage.  Of  that,  less 
than  two  percent  comes  from  the  U.S.  Government.  If  half  of  that  is  controversial, 
unlabeled  government  material  we  are  talking  about  1/20th  of  one  percent  of  news 
content being a concern. There is strong evidence the source of this video is increas-
ingly communicated to viewers based on changes in broadcast practices. 
The Threat to Broadcasters if This Bill is Adopted 

The  most  serious  risk  is  increasing  government  control  over  broadcast  is  news 
limiting  freedom  of  speech—especially  when  coupled  with  the  recent  FCC  Notice  of 
April  13,  which  held  stations  could  be  subject  to  fine  when  failing  to  disclose  the 
source  of  ‘‘matter  furnished  to  them’’  which  could  apply  to  any  information  broad-
casters receive. Depending on how it is interpreted, stations could be subject to fines 
if they aired a report based upon an unnamed source or whistleblower. 
My  Suggestions  for  a  ‘‘Transparency  in  Government  Public  Relations  Video  Act’’  to 

Improve the ‘‘Truth In Broadcasting’’ bill 

This act would require all government video disseminated to news stations wheth-
er they include pre-packaged news stories or not be posted on a government website 
where  the  public  could  access  it.  It  could  be  made  available  in  libraries  so  people 
who do not have Internet access would be able to view it at no charge. This posting 
would  include  the  script  or  transcript  of  sound  bites  as  well  as  slate  information. 
All e-mail and fax pitches on behalf of placing the video would be required to men-

tion that the package is produced by the U.S. Government. 

The  video  tape  would  include  a  graphic  identifying  the  government  as  the  source 
of the video at the front of the tape, the VNR without graphics and a second version 
of the video on the tape with the disclaimer burned in over the entire video to avoid 
confusion and to give broadcasters the option of how its disclaimer should look with-
out  the  threat  of  government  sanction.  Phone  and  e-mail  contact  information  of  a 
spokesperson  from  the  Federal  agency  providing  the  video  would  also  be  included. 
If you are concerned about partisanship, you could allow the Senate majority and 
minority the option to appoint one spokesperson to contribute one sound bite to the 
video for balance. 

The monitoring data detailing which stations broadcast portions of the video could 

also be made public. 

Broadcasters  would  be  encouraged  to  comply  with  the  guidelines  established  by 

the RTNDA for use of third-party video but not required to do so. 

This  bill  would  dramatically  increase  transparency  in  government,  allow  the  dis-
semination  of  more  accurate  information  to  millions  more  people  and  preserve  our 
freedom of the press. 

The CHAIRMAN. Ms. Phair. 

STATEMENT OF JUDITH T. PHAIR, PRESIDENT/CEO, 
PUBLIC RELATIONS SOCIETY OF AMERICA (PRSA) 

Ms.  PHAIR.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Mr.  Chairman,  Senator 
Lautenberg,  Senator  DeMint,  my  name  is  Judy  Phair  and  I  am 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

President  and  CEO  of  the  Public  Relations  Society  of  America.  It 
is  a  great  privilege  and  honor  to  appear  before  you  today,  and  I 
thank you for inviting me. 

I want to testify before you on a subject of paramount importance 
to all of us: ensuring the free flow of information from Government 
to citizens that is an essential and core part of our democracy. 

I  represent  20,000  men  and  women  working  in  the  public  rela-
tions  profession  in  every  State  of  the  Union,  men  and  women  who 
are  committed  to  using  their  professional  skills  to  help  enhance 
communications and dialog between organizations, businesses, gov-
ernment,  not-for-profit  entities,  and  the  communities,  constitu-
encies and the public they serve. We also have 8,000 student mem-
bers on 260 college and university campuses across the Nation. 

Our  mission  is  to  advance  the  profession  of  public  relations,  a 
profession  that  has  as  its  foundation  exactly  what  Senator  Kerry 
was describing earlier this morning, that important free flow of in-
formation throughout society. We are committed to the responsible 
and  ethical  practice  of  public  relations,  and  each  of  our  members 
signs  a  code  of  ethics  that  focuses  on  honesty  and  full  disclosure, 
and  we  have  attached  that  code  of  ethics  with  my  written  testi-
mony.  That  code  helps  govern  our  daily  work,  which  involves  the 
use  of  many  tools  and  tactics  to  deliver  information  and  frame  the 
dialog  between  organizations  and  their  publics.  That  is  extremely 
important  in  the  context  of  S.  967,  which  addresses  one  important 
tool  in  the  public  relations  process,  and  that  is  the  video  news  re-
lease, or VNR. 

Society recognizes that as part of strategic communications plan-
ning,  video  news  releases  can,  in  fact,  be  valuable  tools  promoting 
that  free  flow  of  information.  Just  as  paper  news  releases,  which 
we discussed also in earlier testimony, are used in print journalism 
and follow the style of print journalism, VNRs utilize a format that 
is  suited  to  electronic  media.  Both  print  and  video  news  releases 
deliver  information  to  the  public  via  the  news  media  in  formats 
that are suitable to those media. 

But  we  also  believe  that  VNRs  should  be  produced  and  dissemi-
nated with the highest levels of transparency, candor, and honesty. 
In order to foster open communication leading to informed decision-
making, we must do more than simply funnel information through 
the  media  to  the  public.  We  must  reveal  the  sponsors  for  causes 
and  interests  represented  and  disclose  all  financial  interests  re-
lated to the VNR. We believe that the great majority of public rela-
tions  professionals  and  the  firms  they  work  for  hold  this  view  and 
do practice full disclosure of sources and sponsors to the broadcast 
media.  Therefore,  we  see  no  issue  regarding  the  codification  of  a 
practice  that  Government  communications  professionals  and  their 
contracted agents should already be doing. And that codification is 
indeed what your bill does. 

We support the intent of the legislation, which would require full 
disclosure of the sources for Government VNRs. However, our con-
cern  is  that  some  of  the  provisions  go  beyond  mandating  the  full 
disclosure  of  Government  involvement  and  the  clear  identification 
of  sources  of  information  contained  in  these  releases.  The  portions 
of the bill that are of greatest concern to PRSA regard how this dis-
closure would be made. We believe that those provisions may have 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

the unintended consequence of actually impeding the flow of impor-
tant information to the public. 

We  believe  that  public  relations  professionals  involved  in  pro-
ducing video news releases should provide broadcasters with all the 
information  they  need  in  order  to  decide  the  best  way  to  use  the 
information contained in the releases. 

Broadcasters  should  have  the  ultimate  responsibility  for  pro-
viding disclosure to the public. That disclosure could come in many 
forms,  depending  on  the  content  and  context  of  the  VNR  and  the 
broadcaster’s news production format, as long as the result is to let 
the public know the sources of information. By prescribing the spe-
cifics  of  disclosure  to  be  used  in  the  production  of  Government- 
sponsored  VNRs,  S.  967  could  make  the  process  so  onerous  or  the 
end  results  so  inappropriate  for  broadcast  use  that  stations  might 
not use VNRs at all, thus limiting the free flow of information. 

PRSA  believes  the  Government  should  not  hold  broadcasters  to 
a different standard in presenting news to their viewers than those 
standards that print media impose on themselves. 

We  have  long  advocated  the  ethical,  honest  production  of  video 
news releases and full disclosure of their sponsorship. It is an issue 
that  is  of  vital  importance  to  this  industry,  and  we  are  working 
constantly  to  keep  that  disclosure  bar  set  high  for  our  members 
and by example for others in this profession. VNRs have been used 
successfully,  with  full  disclosure  sources  of  information,  for  con-
veying information to the public about several important programs. 
For  example,  VNRs  were  effective  components  of  public  service 
campaigns on such issues as labeling over-the-counter drug supple-
ments,  seat  belt  usage,  online  tax  return  filing,  and  cancer  detec-
tion and prevention. 

Public relations exists as a profession today because it has estab-
lished  a  level  of  trust  with  the  media  and  the  public.  In  our  role 
of providing information to the public, often through media outlets, 
that  is  essential.  And  we  do  believe  that  imposing  rigid  require-
ments and specifications on the information we provide to the pub-
lic will not best serve that public interest. 

I would certainly be happy to take questions, and thank you very 

much, Mr. Chairman and members of the Committee. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Phair follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JUDITH T. PHAIR, PRESIDENT/CEO, 

PUBLIC RELATIONS SOCIETY OF AMERICA (PRSA) 

Mr. Chairman and members of the Committee: 
On  behalf  of  the  Public  Relations  Society  of  America  I  thank  you  for  the  oppor-

tunity to submit this testimony concerning S. 967. 

PRSA  represents  20,000  public  relations  professionals  in  business,  government, 
education, nonprofit and other sectors. Our membership is divided into ten regional 
Districts with 114 local Chapters in the United States and the District of Columbia. 
We’re governed by a board of directors that is elected by members. Our 8,000 plus- 
member Public Relations Student Society of America has 260 Chapters on campuses 
at colleges and universities throughout the United States. 

The  mission  of  PRSA  is  to  advance  the  profession  of  public  relations  and  public 
relations professionals through education, innovation and adherence to a strong code 
of  ethical  behavior.  The  PRSA  Member  Code  of  Ethics  is  signed  by  each  member 
as  a  prerequisite  to  join.  It  guides  them  in  their  daily  activities  in  the  practice  of 
public relations. 

That’s  extremely  important  in  the  context  of  S.  967,  which  addresses  one  impor-

tant tool in the public relations process—the Video News Release, or VNR. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

Like  members  of  this  committee,  our  members  are  well  aware  of  the  issues  sur-
rounding the production of VNRs by government entities or with Federal funds. And 
our position on VNRs is probably similar to those of each member of this committee. 
Our Society recognizes that, in strategic communications planning, video news re-
leases  can  be  valuable  tools  promoting  the  free  flow  of  information.  Just  as  ‘‘print’’ 
news  releases  follow  the  style  of  print  journalism,  VNRs  utilize  a  format  that  is 
most  adaptable  to  electronic  media.  Both  print  and  video  news  releases  present  in-
formation in a way that is preferred by these respective media and that meets pub-
lic information needs and interests. 

But  we  also  believe  that  VNRs  should  be  produced  and  disseminated  with  the 
highest levels of transparency, candor and honesty. To provide open communication 
that  fosters  informed  decision,  we  must  do  more  than  simply  funnel  information 
through the media to the public. We must reveal the sponsors for causes and inter-
ests  represented  and  disclose  all  financial  interests  related  to  the  VNR.  We  believe 
that  most  of  our  members  and  the  120,000  men  and  women  practicing  public  rela-
tions in the United States today hold that view. 

Therefore,  we  see  no  issue  regarding  the  codification  of  a  practice  that  govern-
ment  communications  professionals  and  their  contracted  agents  should  already  be 
doing. 

Our  concern  with  S.  967  is  that  some  of  its  provisions  go  beyond  what  appears 
to  be  the  intent  of  the  legislation—that  is,  to  require  full  disclosure  of  government 
sponsorship  of  VNRs  and  clear  identification  sources  of  information  contained  in 
those  releases.  The  portions  of  the  bill  of  greatest  concern  to  PRSA  reference  how 
this  disclosure  would  be  made.  We  believe  those  provisions  may  have  the  unin-
tended  consequence  of  actually  impeding  the  free  flow  of  important  information  to 
the public. 

We believe that public relations professionals involved in producing video news re-
leases  should  provide  broadcasters  with  all  the  information  they  need  in  order  to 
decide the best way to use the information contained in the releases. 

Disclosure  to  the  public  is  ultimately  the  responsibility  of  broadcasters.  It  could 
come  in  many  forms,  depending  on  the  content  and  context  of  the  VNR  and  the 
broadcasters’ news production formats, and as long as the result is to keep the pub-
lic totally informed about the sources of information. By proscribing the specifics of 
disclosure  to  be  used  in  the  production  of  government-sponsored  VNRs,  the  S.  967 
could cause some broadcasters not to use the information at all. 

PRSA  believes  the  government  should  not  hold  broadcasters  to  a  different  stand-
ard  in  presenting  news  to  their  viewers  than  those  that  print  media  impose  upon 
themselves. 

PRSA  has  long  advocated  the  ethical,  honest  production  of  video  news  releases 
and  full  disclosure  of  their  sponsorship.  It’s  an  issue  of  vital  importance  to  our  in-
dustry  and  we’re  working  constantly  to  keep  the  disclosure  bar  set  high  for  our 
members  and,  by  example,  for  others  in  our  profession.  VNRs  have  been  used  suc-
cessfully—with  full  disclosure  of  sources  of  information—for  conveying  information 
to  the  public  about  a  number  of  important  public  programs.  For  example,  VNRs 
have been effective components of public service campaigns on such topics as label-
ing  of  over-the-counter  drug  supplements,  seat  belt  usage,  online  tax  return  filing 
and cancer detection and prevention. 

Public  relations  exists  as  a  profession  today  because  it  has  established  a  level  of 
trust with the media and the public. In our role of providing information to the pub-
lic—often through media outlets—that trust is essential. 

We  can  be  ‘‘trusted’’  only  if  we  work  diligently  to  earn  trust.  We  believe  that  im-
posing  rigid  requirements  and  specifications  on  the  information  we  provide  to  the 
public will not best serve the building of this trust. 

Thank you. 

STATEMENT OF THE PUBLIC RELATIONS SOCIETY OF AMERICA (PRSA) 

ON VIDEO NEWS RELEASES (VNRS) 

Extensive discussion was focused in recent weeks on a Video News Release (VNR) 
produced  by  the  Department  of  Health  and  Human  Services  (DHHS)  pertaining  to 
the  recently  enacted  Medicare  drug  bill.  Content  of  the  video  release  touched  off 
partisan  debate  and  discussion  but  also  raised  ethical  questions  about  the  use  of 
VNRs. Because VNRs are a basic public relations tool used by corporations, organi-
zations  and  other  entities  to  provide  news  content  to  television  stations  and  thus 
communicate  with  the  public,  PRSA  believes  that  it  is  important  for  there  to  be  a 
better understanding of the role and usage of VNRs. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

Three principles are at work here: 
• A  VNR  is  the  television  equivalent  of  a  press  release  and,  as  such,  should  al-

ways be truthful and represent the highest in ethical standards. 

• Producers  and  distributors  of  VNRs  and  the  organizations  they  represent 

should clearly and plainly identify themselves. 

• Television stations airing VNRs should identify sources of the material. 
Background:  The  VNR  is  the  video  equivalent  of  a  press  release,  a  written  docu-
ment  sent  to  the  media.  The  VNR  is  designed  specifically  for  TV  stations  and  con-
sists  of  many  elements  including  a  complete  story  with  visuals  and  narration/ 
voiceovers,  a  suggested  written  script,  added  video  that  can  be  used  by  the  station 
and  suggested  ways  the  story  can  be  localized.  Public  relations  professionals  have 
produced VNRs in this manner for more than 25 years, and media outlets have used 
them on a regular basis. 

Issue  in  Question:  One  of  the  issues  raised  about  the  DHHS  VNR  was  the  inclu-
sion  of  a  sign-off  identification  at  the  completion  of  the  story  that  uses  the  words 
‘‘reporting.’’  This  has  caused  some  confusion  among  people  who  question  whether 
someone who is not actually a reporter should be identified in a manner that could 
suggest that he or she is a journalist. While this is often done when VNRs are pro-
duced, we agree that this can be considered confusing and/or misleading. 

PRSA Position: 

1.  Organizations  that  produce  VNRs  should  clearly  identify  the  VNR  as  such 
and fully disclose who produced and paid for it at the time the VNR is provided 
to TV stations. 
2. PRSA recommends that organizations that prepare VNRs should not use the 
word ‘‘reporting’’ if the narrator is not a reporter. 
3. Use of VNRs or footage provided by sources other than the station or network 
should be identified as to source by the media outlet when it is aired. 

PRSA  supports  use  of  VNRs  as  useful  public  relations  tools.  They  will  continue 
to  be  effective  when  adhering  to  the  highest  standards  of  practice  as  described 
above. 
About PRSA 

The Public Relations Society of America (www.prsa.org), based in New York City, 
is  the  world’s  largest  organization  for  public  relations  professionals  helping  to  ad-
vance the profession and the professional. Its nearly 20,000 members, organized into 
116  Chapters  nationwide,  18  Professional  Interest  Sections  along  with  Affinity 
Groups,  represent  business  and  industry,  counseling  firms,  independent  practi-
tioners,  military,  government,  associations,  hospitals,  schools,  professional  services 
firms and nonprofit organizations. 

PRSA Position on VNRS Overall 

Free Flow of Information—Protecting and advancing the free flow of accurate and 
truthful  information  is  essential  to  serving  the  public  interest  and  contributing  to 
informed  decision-making  in  a  democratic  society.  VNRs  are  among  the  many  tools 
used to ensure that information flows freely. 

Full  Disclosure—Open  communication  fosters  informed  decision-making  in  a 
democratic  society.  We  must  be  honest  and  accurate  in  all  communications,  reveal 
the sponsors for causes and interests represented and disclose all financial interests. 
PRSA Position on U.S. Senate Bill S. 967 

• PRSA  supports  the  spirit  of  legislation  that  ensures  the  free  flow  of  accurate 
and  truthful  information  and  requires  full  disclosure  of  sponsors  and  financial 
interests.  However,  disclosure  by  broadcasters  could  come  in  many  forms,  de-
pending  on  the  content  and  context  of  the  VNR  and  how  it  fits  into  the  indi-
vidual  entities’  news  production  formats.  Then  all  VNRs  would  serve  the  pur-
pose of keeping the public totally informed about the sources of information. 

• PRSA  believes  the  government  should  not  hold  broadcasters  to  a  different 

standard than print media in presenting news to their viewers. 

• PRSA  is  concerned  that  such  regulation  could  spill  over  into  the  private  sector 
and  inappropriately  impose  tighter  regulation  on  the  media,  which  could  raise 
serious First Amendment constitutional questions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

• Again,  while  PRSA  supports  the  spirit  of  Senate  S.  967,  PRSA  believes  that 
more  robust  self-regulation  of  VNRs  by  broadcasters  is  the  optimum  way  to 
manage the issue of full disclosure. 

Members of Senate Commerce Committee 

http://commerce.senate.gov/about/membership.html 

PRSA Official Position on VNRs 

http://www.prsa.org/lNews/leaders/vnrs0404.asp 

PRSA Code of Ethics 

http://www.prsa.org/lAbout/ethics/index.asp?ident=eth1 

PUBLIC RELATIONS SOCIETY OF AMERICA—MEMBER CODE OF ETHICS 2000 

• Professional Values 
• Principles of Conduct 
• Commitment and Compliance 
This  Code  applies  to  PRSA  members.  The  Code  is  designed  to  be  a  useful  guide 
for  PRSA  members  as  they  carry  out  their  ethical  responsibilities.  This  document 
is  designed  to  anticipate  and  accommodate,  by  precedent,  ethical  challenges  that 
may arise. The scenarios outlined in the Code provision are actual examples of mis-
conduct. More will be added as experience with the Code occurs. 

The Public Relations Society of America (PRSA) is committed to ethical practices. 
The level of public trust PRSA members seek, as we serve the public good and advo-
cate  for  our  clients,  means  we  have  taken  on  a  special  obligation  to  operate  ethi-
cally. 

The value of member reputation depends upon the ethical conduct of everyone af-
filiated  with  the  Public  Relations  Society  of  America.  Each  of  us  sets  an  example 
for  each  other—as  well  as  other  professionals—by  our  pursuit  of  excellence  with 
powerful standards of performance, professionalism, and ethical conduct. 

Emphasis on enforcement has been eliminated. But, the PRSA Board of Directors 
retains  the  right  to  bar  from  membership  or  expel  from  the  Society  any  individual 
who  has  been  or  is  sanctioned  by  a  government  agency  or  convicted  in  a  court  of 
law of an action that is in violation of this Code. 

Ethical practice is the most important obligation of a PRSA member. 

PRSA MEMBER STATEMENT OF PROFESSIONAL VALUES 

This  statement  presents  the  core  values  of  PRSA  members  and,  more  broadly,  of 
the public relations profession. These values provide the foundation for the Member 
Code  of  Ethics  and  set  the  industry  standard  for  the  professional  practice  of  public 
relations. These values are the fundamental beliefs that guide our behaviors and de-
cision-making  process.  We  believe  our  professional  values  are  vital  to  the  integrity 
of the profession as a whole. 
Advocacy 

• We serve the public interest by acting as responsible advocates for those we rep-

• We provide a voice in the marketplace of ideas, facts, and viewpoints to aid in-

resent. 

formed public debate. 

Honesty 

• We adhere to the highest standards of accuracy and truth in advancing the in-

terests of those we represent and in communicating with the public. 

Expertise 

• We acquire and responsibly use specialized knowledge and experience. 
• We  advance  the  profession  through  continued  professional  development,  re-
• We  build  mutual  understanding,  credibility,  and  relationships  among  a  wide 

search, and education. 

array of institutions and audiences. 

Independence 

• We provide objective counsel to those we represent. 
• We are accountable for our actions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

Loyalty 

the public interest. 

• We  are  faithful  to  those  we  represent,  while  honoring  our  obligation  to  serve 

Fairness 

• We  deal  fairly  with  clients,  employers,  competitors,  peers,  vendors,  the  media, 
• We respect all opinions and support the right of free expression. 

and the general public. 

Free Flow of Information 
Core Principle 

PRSA CODE PROVISIONS 

Protecting and advancing the free flow of accurate and truthful information is es-
sential  to  serving  the  public  interest  and  contributing  to  informed  decision  making 
in a democratic society. 
Intent 

• To maintain the integrity of relationships with the media, government officials, 
• To aid informed decision making. 

and the public. 

Guidelines 

A member shall: 
• Preserve the integrity of the process of communication. 
• Be honest and accurate in all communications. 
• Act  promptly  to  correct  erroneous  communications  for  which  the  practitioner  is 
• Preserve  the  free  flow  of  unprejudiced  information  when  giving  or  receiving 

responsible. 

gifts by ensuring that gifts are nominal, legal, and infrequent. 

Examples of Improper Conduct Under this Provision 

• A member representing a ski manufacturer gives a pair of expensive racing skis 
to  a  sports  magazine  columnist,  to  influence  the  columnist  to  write  favorable 
articles about the product. 
• A  member  entertains  a  government  official  beyond  legal  limits  and/or  in  viola-

tion of government reporting requirements. 

Competition 
Core Principle 

Promoting  healthy  and  fair  competition  among  professionals  preserves  an  ethical 

climate while fostering a robust business environment. 
Intent 

• To  promote  respect  and  fair  competition  among  public  relations  professionals. 
• To  serve  the  public  interest  by  providing  the  widest  choice  of  practitioner  op-

tions. 
Guidelines 

A member shall: 
• Follow  ethical  hiring  practices  designed  to  respect  free  and  open  competition 
• Preserve intellectual property rights in the marketplace. 

without deliberately undermining a competitor. 

Examples of Improper Conduct Under This Provision 

• A  member  employed  by  a  ‘‘client  organization’’  shares  helpful  information  with 
a counseling firm that is competing with others for the organization’s business. 
• A member spreads malicious and unfounded rumors about a competitor in order 
to alienate the competitor’s clients and employees in a ploy to recruit people and 
business. 

Disclosure of Information 
Core Principle 

Open communication fosters informed decision making in a democratic society. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

• To  build  trust  with  the  public  by  revealing  all  information  needed  for  respon-

Intent 

sible decision making. 

Guidelines 

A member shall: 
• Be honest and accurate in all communications. 
• Act  promptly  to  correct  erroneous  communications  for  which  the  member  is  re-

sponsible. 

those represented. 

• Investigate  the  truthfulness  and  accuracy  of  information  released  on  behalf  of 

• Reveal the sponsors for causes and interests represented. 
• Disclose  financial  interest  (such  as  stock  ownership)  in  a  client’s  organization. 
• Avoid deceptive practices. 

Examples of Improper Conduct Under this Provision 

• Front  groups:  A  member  implements  ‘‘grass  roots’’  campaigns  or  letter-writing 

campaigns to legislators on behalf of undisclosed interest groups. 

• Lying  by  omission:  A  practitioner  for  a  corporation  knowingly  fails  to  release 
financial  information,  giving  a  misleading  impression  of  the  corporation’s  per-
formance. 

• A  member  discovers  inaccurate  information  disseminated  via  a  website  or 

media kit and does not correct the information. 

• A  member  deceives  the  public  by  employing  people  to  pose  as  volunteers  to 

speak at public hearings and participate in ‘‘grass roots’’ campaigns. 

Safeguarding Confidences 
Core Principle 

Client  trust  requires  appropriate  protection  of  confidential  and  private  informa-

• To  protect  the  privacy  rights  of  clients,  organizations,  and  individuals  by  safe-

guarding confidential information. 

tion. 
Intent 

Guidelines 

A member shall: 
• Safeguard the confidences and privacy rights of present, former, and prospective 

• Protect  privileged,  confidential,  or  insider  information  gained  from  a  client  or 

clients and employees. 

organization. 

• Immediately  advise  an  appropriate  authority  if  a  member  discovers  that  con-
fidential  information  is  being  divulged  by  an  employee  of  a  client  company  or 
organization. 

Examples of Improper Conduct Under This Provision 

• A  member  changes  jobs,  takes  confidential  information,  and  uses  that  informa-

tion in the new position to the detriment of the former employer. 

• A member intentionally leaks proprietary information to the detriment of some 

other party. 

Conflicts of Interest 
Core Principle 

Avoiding  real,  potential,  or  perceived  conflicts  of  interest  builds  the  trust  of  cli-

ents, employers, and the publics. 
Intent 

• To earn trust and mutual respect with clients or employers. 
• To  build  trust  with  the  public  by  avoiding  or  ending  situations  that  put  one’s 

personal or professional interests in conflict with society’s interests. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Guidelines 

44 

ber’s personal interests. 

A member shall: 
• Act in the best interests of the client or employer, even subordinating the mem-
• Avoid actions and circumstances that may appear to compromise good business 
• Disclose promptly any existing or potential conflict of interest to affected clients 
• Encourage clients and customers to determine if a conflict exists after notifying 

judgment or create a conflict between personal and professional interests. 

or organizations. 

all affected parties. 

Examples of Improper Conduct Under This Provision 

• The  member  fails  to  disclose  that  he  or  she  has  a  strong  financial  interest  in 
• The member represents a ‘‘competitor company’’ or a ‘‘conflicting interest’’ with-

a client’s chief competitor. 

out informing a prospective client. 

Enhancing the Profession 
Core Principle 

Public  relations  professionals  work  constantly  to  strengthen  the  public’s  trust  in 

the profession. 
Intent 

• To build respect and credibility with the public for the profession of public rela-
• To improve, adapt, and expand professional practices. 

tions. 

Guidelines 

conduct. 

A member shall: 
• Acknowledge  that  there  is  an  obligation  to  protect  and  enhance  the  profession. 
• Keep informed and educated about practices in the profession to ensure ethical 
• Actively pursue personal professional development. 
• Decline  representation  of  clients  or  organizations  that  urge  or  require  actions 
• Accurately define what public relations activities can accomplish. 
• Counsel subordinates in proper ethical decision making. 
• Require that subordinates adhere to the ethical requirements of the Code. 
• Report  ethical  violations,  whether  committed  by  PRSA  members  or  not,  to  the 

contrary to this Code. 

appropriate authority. 

Examples of Improper Conduct Under This Provision 

• A PRSA member declares publicly that a product the client sells is safe, without 
• A  member  initially  assigns  some  questionable  client  work  to  a  non-member 

disclosing evidence to the contrary. 

practitioner to avoid the ethical obligation of PRSA membership. 

Resources 
Rules and Guidelines 

The following PRSA documents, available online at www.prsa.org provide detailed 
rules  and  guidelines  to  help  guide  your  professional  behavior.  If,  after  reviewing 
them, you still have a question or issue, contact PRSA headquarters as noted below. 

• PRSA Bylaws 
• PRSA Administrative Rules 
• Member Code of Ethics 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

PRSA MEMBER CODE OF ETHICS PLEDGE 

I pledge: 

To  conduct  myself  professionally,  with  truth,  accuracy,  fairness,  and  responsi-
bility  to  the  public;  to  improve  my  individual  competence  and  advance  the 
knowledge  and  proficiency  of  the  profession  through  continuing  research  and 
education;  and  to  adhere  to  the  articles  of  the  Member  Code  of  Ethics  2000  for 
the  practice  of  public  relations  as  adopted  by  the  governing  Assembly  of  the 
Public Relations Society of America. 

I  understand  and  accept  that  there  is  a  consequence  for  misconduct,  up  to  and 

including membership revocation. 

And,  I  understand  that  those  who  have  been  or  are  sanctioned  by  a  government 
agency  or  convicted  in  a  court  of  law  of  an  action  that  is  in  violation  of  this  Code 
may be barred from membership or expelled from the Society. 

llllllllllllllllllll 

Signature 

llllllllllllllllllll 

Date 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, all of you. 
My first question to all of you is how long have VNRs been used 
in the industry. Ms. Poling, did you look back in other Administra-
tions? 

Ms.  POLING.  No.  Our  study  was  very  narrow.  We  were  asked  to 
look  at  certain  video  news  releases  and  we  did  so.  So  there  were 
just  two.  However,  we  did  see  some  from  the  Clinton  Administra-
tion, but we were not doing a study that focused on that. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  The  rest  of  you  in  the  industry,  how  long  have 

these been used by the industry? 

Mr.  SIMON.  Sure,  Mr.  Chairman.  As  I  noted  in  my  testimony,  I 
have  been  told  the  first  VNRs  were  in  the  late  1940s  and  they  be-
came  popular  in  the  1950s,  1960s.  I  had  one  source  who  said  they 
thought  President  Kennedy  had  used  video  like  this  in  his  cam-
paign in the 1960s, but I could not confirm that independently. But 
it has been a common public relations tool basically since television 
news started to play such a prominent role. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  assume  you  are  all  familiar  with  the  provision 
that  is  in  the  defense  supplemental  appropriations  bill  that  was 
passed,  signed  by  the  President.  The  Byrd  Amendment  requires 
Federal  agencies  to  clearly  label  prepackaged  news  stories  that 
they  produce.  The  difference  between  that  and  this  bill,  this  bill 
would  require  in  video  that  there  be  a  cutline  that  appears  con-
stantly  throughout  the  use.  All  the  footage  would  have  this  on  it, 
contrary  to  the  political  ad  where  there  has  to  be  a  cutline  at  the 
end  saying  this  was  paid  for  by  the  candidate.  What  about  that? 
First,  can  you  live  with  the  Byrd  Amendment?  We  all  voted  for 

it. Can you live with it? 

Amendment. 

Ms.  COCHRAN.  Senator,  yes.  We  have  no  objection  to  the  Byrd 

Ms. PHAIR. Mr. Chairman, neither do we. 
Mr.  SIMON.  I  have  no  objection  to  the  Byrd  Amendment,  and  I 

think it makes sense when applied to this issue. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Now,  in  terms  of  this  constant  exposure  on  pre-
packaged  news  stories,  what  is  going  to  be  the  impact  of  that  on 
anything, just something like we just saw now? 

Ms.  COCHRAN.  Senator,  I  will  begin.  I  think  you  heard  from  the 
colleagues  here  that  imposing  this  kind  of  one-size-fits-all  solution 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

to  a  video  is  problematic.  In  some  instances,  a  uniform  description 
may not even be the most accurate information that you could give 
the  public.  I  think  the  public  benefits  from  learning  exactly  what 
Federal  agency  has  originated  the  material.  One  example  that  I 
use  is  NASA  animation  of  a  space  shot,  and  it  is  used  very  widely 
in  television  stories  because  it  helps  the  viewer  understand  and  it 
is the most authoritative source coming from NASA. 

The CHAIRMAN. Pardon me just a moment. We have got a limita-

tion on time. 

The  term  ‘‘prepackaged  news  story’’  means  a  complete,  ready-to- 
use  audio  or  visual  news  segment  designed  to  be  indistinguishable 
from  a  news  segment  produced  by  an  independent  organization. 
How  can  you  distinguish  it?  I  do  not  understand.  Could  you  live 
with that? The test would be if it was designed to be indistinguish-
able from something that you produce. 

Ms.  COCHRAN.  I  think  it  is  problematic  because  that  is  not  how 
these packages are used. Often segments are used. Everyone is not 
as  considerate  as  the  example  that  we  saw,  as  to  send  B-roll  and 
excerpts that can be used by themselves. So often the prepackaged 
material  is  broken  down  and  used.  Bits  and  pieces  of  it  can  be 
used. If it has that labeling on it, then it becomes very problematic. 
The CHAIRMAN. Ms. Poling, in the definition section, it says, ‘‘The 
term ‘agency’ has the same meaning given such term in section 551 
of title 5, United States Code, and includes the Executive Office of 
the President.’’ That ‘‘and’’ is not normal. 

Ms. POLING. Repeat the question. The ‘‘and’’ is what? 
The CHAIRMAN. The clause that starts with ‘‘and includes the Ex-
ecutive  Office  of  the  President’’  is  not  normally  within  the  defini-
tion of an agency. Is it? 

Ms.  POLING.  GAO  has  no  comments  on  the  bill,  but  just  from  a 
legal perspective, you are correct. It is not normally included in the 
definition of an agency. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  So  this  is  the  entire  purpose  of  the  bill,  to  in-
clude this and make sure that it applies to the Office of the Presi-
dent. 

Senator Lautenberg. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks, Mr. Chairman. 
The  intention  of  the  bill  is  to  make  all  Government  agencies  re-

The CHAIRMAN. It does not apply to Congress. You have extended 

it to the President of the United States, but not to Congress. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Well,  in  the  case  where  we  see  the  abuse 
of  this  information,  we  do  not  have  in  the  Congress  opportunities 
to issue VNRs independently. No broadcaster is going to take some-
thing that comes from my office or your office and put it on the air 
and say that the situation in Alaska regarding drilling—— 

The CHAIRMAN. Mine do. 
[Laughter.] 
The CHAIRMAN. We issue them every week. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  You  were  so  lucky  to  have  the  endorse-
ment of how beautiful Alaska is, and I can see that you were happy 
with  that.  So  I  am  content  to  exempt  Alaska  from  some  of  these 
things. 

sponsible. 

[Laughter.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  But  in  all  seriousness,  I  am  really  sur-
prised  to  hear  some  of  our  friends  at  the  table  suggest  that  this 
could  be  an  interference  in  the  free  flow  of  information.  What  is 
better for the public than to know exactly who is saying what? You 
can  produce  it.  There  is  virtually  no  interference.  We  deliberately 
did not place any burden on the broadcasters. 

As  a  matter  of  fact,  despite  the  technology,  Ms.  Poling,  what  do 
you  think  of  Mr.  Simon’s  comment  about  technology  being  able  to 
sort  things  out  in  a  different  way  so  that  it  is  more  discernible 
when they get a piece of VNR to produce? 

Ms. POLING. I am not sure I have a view on this. 
What we would say at GAO is that it is important that these pre-
packaged news stories—and I believe his goes beyond prepackaged 
news  stories—identify  the  source  of  the  Federal  agency.  We  think 
that is essential. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  We  say  in  our  legislation  that  it  ought  to 
be  run  as  long  as  that  VNR  runs.  If  it  runs  for  10  seconds,  it 
should  be  on  there  for  10  seconds.  If  it  runs  for  30  seconds,  it 
should be on there for 30 seconds. 

Mr.  Chairman,  there  is  no  doubt  about  the  attempt  to  deceive 
when  we  hear  Karen  Ryan  say—she  does  not  say  I  am  doing  this 
for  the  U.S.  Government.  She  said  I  am  Karen  Ryan.  The  idea  is 
to  imitate.  And  if  we  have  to  see  that  clip  again,  it  would  be  fine 
with  me.  But  it  is  designed  to  imitate  a  reporter.  Otherwise,  why 
present it that way? 

Ms.  Poling,  some  of  that  we  know  was  legitimate  news.  The 
President signing a bill. I do not have any problem with that. That 
is  picked  up  by  the  news  cameras  themselves.  But  when  it  is  a 
story  to  sell  something  and  you  show  the  pharmacy  and  so  forth, 
that can, even stretching the imagination a little bit, say, well, OK, 
it  is  part  of  a  news  clip  as  long  as  it  is  developed  by  the  station 
itself, the broadcaster. 

I would appreciate hearing from GAO on this. Is there any harm 
that  comes  from  identifying  that  this  is  a  piece  of  a  Government 
production? Do you see any burden on the broadcast industry as a 
result of that? 

Ms.  POLING.  Well,  our  study  did  not  deal  with  the  broadcast  in-
dustry  at  all.  But  the  basic  principle  underlying  our  opinions  is 
that  the  agencies  must  disclose  themselves  to  the  targeted  audi-
ence  which  is  the  television-viewing  audience.  We  think  it  is  very 
important  that  there  be  disclosure  so  that  the  audience  can  assess 
the  information,  which  I  also  heard  from  other  members  of  the 
panel  up  here,  and  also  that  the  taxpayers  have  a  right  to  know 
when the Government is speaking to them. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Ms.  Cochran,  several  news  directors  ran 
the  Karen  Ryan  piece  without  realizing  that  it  was  Government- 
sponsored  VNR.  Would  it  not  be  simpler  for  your  news  directors, 
your  group,  if  the  Government  simply  included  a  clear  disclaimer 
in the story itself? 

Ms.  COCHRAN.  We  are  all  in  favor  of  that  kind  of  disclosure.  I 
think  what  we  are  concerned  about  is  the  specific  prescription  as 
it  appears  in  the  bill  because  we  think  it  limits  the  editorial  deci-
sions, if you like, just the look of how that disclaimer or that disclo-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

sure  will  appear  on  the  air.  We  think  that  how  that  looks  on  the 
air should be in the hands of the people producing the news. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Well,  to  me  it  would  seem  more  appro-
priate  if  we  had  a  uniform  standard  and  said,  OK,  this  is  it.  I 
would  be  happy,  Mr.  Chairman,  to  work  with  people  from  the  in-
dustry,  keeping  in  mind  that  our  mission  in  this  bill  is  very  clear. 
It says that transparency is the objective and that if it is produced 
by the Government, let us not fool anybody. 

Again,  we  acknowledge  that  it  happened—I  did  not  realize  Mr. 
Simon was old enough to remember what might have happened in 
the Nixon days. Of course, you and I remember it clearly. 

The CHAIRMAN. It is nice to work with kids like you. 
[Laughter.] 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  You  are  looking  at  40  percent  of  the  vet-

eran population of World War II sitting here. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  If  we  could  arrive  at  the  most  convenient 
way  of  displaying  it,  but  one  that  is  visible  and  one  that  tells  the 
story, Mr. Chairman, I would be happy to do it and work with you. 
You have been eminently fair because I know that you do not fully 
agree  here,  but  you  are  at  least  willing  to  have  the  problem  aired. 
So  I  am  grateful  to  you.  I  would  submit  if  we  have  a  chance  to 
work  this  over  in  the  next  few  weeks,  I  think  that  if  the  Byrd 
Amendment was so acceptable, then the least we ought to do is try 
to make it permanent, improve it if we can, but not to let it termi-
nate  and  then  have  to  worry  about  what  happens  after  September 
30. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  It  has  been  our  announced  intention  to  try  to 
make  the  Byrd  Amendment  permanent  because  it  is  acceptable, 
and I think it meets the objectives of the original issue. And I will 
be willing to join you at any time in making that permanent. 

But in any event, if that is not acceptable, it would be my feeling 
that  this  committee  ought  to  wait  for  the  outcome  of  the  comment 
period  that  the  FCC  has  established,  and  we  will  take  the  bill  up 
at  the  end  of  July  after  we  receive  that,  before  the  August  recess, 
if  it  is  necessary.  If  we  do  not  adopt  the  Byrd  Amendment  perma-
nently,  we  will  take  it  up  sometime  in  July  after  the  comment  pe-
riod is over. 

But  let  me  thank  you  all  for  your  testimony.  I  appreciate  your 

courtesy very much. There is a vote on. 

[Whereupon, at 11:47 a.m., the Committee was adjourned.] 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  13:02 Nov 08, 2010 Jkt 061937 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\61937.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

